,job_title,company,location,salary,description,counts,city
0,"Senior Associate, Data Scientist - Valuations Team",Capital One - US,"McLean, VA",None,"Center 1 (19052), United States of America, McLean, Virginia
Senior Associate, Data Scientist - Valuations Team
Data is at the center of everything we do. As a startup, we disrupted the credit card industry by individually personalizing every credit card offer using statistical modeling and the relational database, cutting edge technology in 1988! Fast-forward a few years, and this little innovation and our passion for data has skyrocketed us to a Fortune 200 company and a leader in the world of data-driven decision-making.
As a Data Scientist at Capital One, you’ll be part of a team that’s leading the next wave of disruption at a whole new scale, using the latest in computing and machine learning technologies and operating across billions of customer records to unlock the big opportunities that help everyday people save money, time and agony in their financial lives.
Team Description
As a Data Scientist at Capital One, you’ll be part of the Valuations team for our Branded Card Customer Acquisition group, assisting our vertical lines of business in critical analytical decision making. In this role, you will apply your modeling expertise and software engineering skills to design, build, deploy and monitor our valuation models.
Role Description
In this role, you will:
Partner with a cross-functional team of data scientists, software engineers, and business analysts to deliver a product customers love
Leverage a broad stack of technologies — Python, Conda, AWS, H2O, Spark, Docker and more — to reveal the insights hidden within huge volumes of numeric and textual data
Build machine learning models through all phases of development, from design through training, evaluation, validation, and implementation
Flex your interpersonal skills to translate the complexity of your work into tangible business goals
The Ideal Candidate is:
Creative. You thrive on bringing definition to big, undefined problems. You love asking questions and pushing hard to find answers. You’re not afraid to share a new idea.
Statistically-minded. You’ve built models, validated them, and back tested them. You know how to interpret a confusion matrix or a ROC curve. You have experience with clustering, classification, survival modeling, time series, and deep learning.
Technical. You’re comfortable with open-source languages and are passionate about developing further. You have hands-on experience developing data science solutions using open-source tools and cloud computing platforms.
A data guru. “Big data” doesn’t phase you. You have the skills to retrieve, combine, and analyze data from a variety of sources and structures. You know understanding the data is often the key to great data science.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree plus 2 years of experience in data analytics, or Master’s Degree, or PhD
At least 1 year of experience in open source programming languages for large scale data analysis
At least 1 year of experience with machine learning
At least 1 year of experience with relational databases
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s Degree in “STEM” field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics), or PhD in “STEM” field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics)
Experience working with AWS
At least 2 years’ experience in Python, Scala, or R
At least 2 years’ experience with machine learning
At least 2 years’ experience with SQL
Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",466,Washington
1,Senior Data Scientist,Intone Networks,"Herndon, VA",None,"Required: MS or PhD in Computer Science, or related field or experience 6+ years of information extraction, NLP, statistical data analysis and predictive modeling 3+ years’ experience developing commercial software products Implementing and deploying standard NLP systems for text classification, entity extraction, sentiment analysis, etc. with extensive experience in Collecting and preparing training data Training supervised and unsupervised models Optimizing model hyperparameters Analyzing errors for machine learning models Real-world application of deep learning to train NLP models Responsibilities: Design, develop and evaluate machine learning models suitable for text analytics tasks such as extraction, disambiguation and classification Contribute to the design of solutions that fit the business problem, may include custom algorithm development Develop new features for existing products, implement proof of concept and prototypes Work closely with product development teams and product stakeholders following an Agile product development methodology Effectively communicate with fellow technologists and other stakeholders Knowledge, Skills, and Tech: Non-trivial project experience in text analysis, information extraction, entity extraction, machine learning and natural language processing Strong working knowledge of Bayesian Statistics, Supervised and Unsupervised Machine Learning, and Deep Learning Experience building models with at least one of the following techniques/tools: SVM, Naïve-Bayes, CRF, Binary/Multinomial Logistic Regression, LDA, word2vec, doc2vec Transfer Learning for NLP Strong programming skills required in Python, at least one other language like Java or C++ is desired Tools/Libraries: NumPy, Pandas, Scikit-Learn, NLTK, Gensim, SpaCy, PyTorch, Jupyter Notebooks Transformers Experience with SQL, NoSQL databases Strong cross-platform skills (Linux and Windows) Experience developing software within an Agile product development environment",466,Washington
2,Federal - Data Scientist - Senior,Accenture,"Ashburn, VA 20147",None,"Organization: Accenture Federal ServicesLocation: Chantilly, VAWe are: Accenture Federal Services bring together commercial innovation with the latest technology to unleash the potential for our federal clients. Operating in the nation’s Capital, we stay ahead of what is coming next. Drawing from the power of Accenture, we deliver integrated, mobile and interactive experiences that exceed our people’s expectations. Join us where ideas are freely exchanged, and concepts evolve into practical solutions.You are: An inventor and a problem-solver. Curious and future-focused, you are always looking to dive deep into new technologies and meaningfully apply them. You are ready to work with engineers and stakeholders to create intelligent solutions for clients.The work:• Work with clients to create questions and define technology opportunities• Drive the exploration of data sources and analytic techniques to create newmodeling approaches• Work with large data sets to solve complex problems• Apply statistical methods to develop analytic models

Here's what you need:• Experience with Python and/or R Programming Language• Experience with SQL or similar database language• Experience with analytics, statistical modeling, optimization, machine learning, and/or artificial intelligence• Experience in consulting or similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery• Experience extracting, aggregating, and structuring data along different dimensionsBonus points:• You have experience with visualization (e.g. Power BI, Tableau, MicroStrategy, d3.js)• You have experience with machine learning frameworks (e.g. TensorFlow, Scikit-Learn, Spark)• You have experience with RDBMS (MariaDB, PostgreSQL, Oracle)• You have experience with Agile MethodologyImportant InformationApplicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture Federal Services.Accenture Federal Services is an EEO and Affirmative Action Employer of Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.Equal Employment Opportunity: All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.Accenture Federal Services is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.An active security clearance or the ability to obtain one may be required for this role.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",466,Washington
3,"Data Scientist, Senior",TENICA and Associates LLC,"Springfield, VA 22150",None,"TENICA is looking to hire a Senior Data Scientist in Springfield, VA. MUST HAVE TS/SCI.

Develop and conduct algorithm quality trade studies related to synthetic aperture radar imagery, identifying best use cases for selected algorithms, and characterizing performance of algorithms when used outside the best use case scenarios. Prototype an analytical procedure that will generate confidence values based on algorithm outputs. Refine the verification and validation process for analytics. Enhance existing models to leverage analytic output for driving automated tasking. Develop scripts for running and testing the algorithms and analytics, using programs such as Databricks, Python, and Jupyter Notebook. Make presentations and reports at the request of the government in addition to a task kick off, midpoint review, and final report and presentation.

Experience in at least two of the following areas is required: Mathematics/Statistics; Computer Science; Domain Expertise/ Analysis; and Presentation.9 years of experience and a MA/MS degree. In place of the degree, may substitute 19 years of relevant work experience. Desirable skills and experience include synthetic aperture radar image science or analysis; other remote sensing imaging such as multispectral; programming and script development; data science; Python, Databricks, Jupyter Notebook; Intelligence Community analytical workflows.",466,Washington
4,Senior Data Scientist,Donya Consulting Group,"Arlington, VA 22202 (Aurora Highlands area)","$165,000 - $192,000 a year","CLEARANCE LEVEL REQUIRED: TOP SECRETExperience: 8 years with Intelligence Community experience 2 yrsThe successful Sr Data Scientist in Defense Intelligence will support the Office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Intelligence and Security – OUSD(I&S). The effort will include the modernization, alignment and integration of Combatant Command Intelligence capabilities and the rest of the Defense Intelligence Enterprise. As a member of enterprise team, you will work with analysts, engineers, and other scientists using innovative techniques and tools to drive decision making. The successful Data Scientist will employ analytical methods or platforms to communicate predictions, findings, or risks through effective data visualizations and reports in support of the Combatant Commands. Producing applied data science techniques in the intelligence field, our Data Scientist will be impacting real time decision making.Essential Job ResponsibilitiesExtract data from a variety of sources (databases, web, text files) and in a variety of formats (structured, unstructured, JSON, etc.) and prepare the data for analysisDescribe data using qualitative and quantitative aggregation/summarization and build tools (static reports, interactive dashboards, web applications) that allow clients to easily view and understand important patterns and trends in the dataProvide quantitative comparisons of data points using advanced statistical analysis including data reduction techniques, resampling, as well as traditional statistical hypothesis testingConstruct and validate predictive models using a variety of techniquesPrepare analytic products in written, oral, visual, and/or multimedia formats.Devise open-source research and collection management practices.Facilitate and manage intelligence processes and practices.Preferred RequirementsText Analytics - IN-SPIRE, Jigsaw, RData Analytics – Excel, Power BI, TableauDocument Development - Word, MS Publisher, Adobe suiteVisual Analytics – Kibana, Virtualitics, GraphikaVisualization - Gephi, Word cloud, R or JavaGraphics Production - PowerPoint, Adobe Creative Suite, Photoshop, HTML5Programming – Python, SQL, API DevelopmentDatabase – Database Modeling, Database Management, Database TypesData Ingestion – ETL/ELT, NIFI, KAFKA, ESBJob Type: Full-timePay: $165,000.00 - $192,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus paySigning bonusEducation:Master's (Preferred)Experience:Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)Python: 1 year (Preferred)Security Clearance:Top Secret (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",466,Washington
5,"Data Analyst, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Identifies and collects data sources, analyzes and extracts key data and information, evaluates and monitors data quality to meet the organization's information system needs and requirements. Applies advanced consulting skills and/or extensive technical expertise; full industry knowledge. Develops innovative solutions to complex problems. Works without considerable direction; mentors and may supervise team members.
Basic Qualifications:
3+ years of experience in working with defense, law enforcement, the intelligence community, or national security professionals
Experience with aggregating, visualizing, or analyzing large volumes of data
Experience with programming languages, including R, Python, or Visual Basic macros
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree
Additional Qualifications:
Experience in working with teams on challenging problems for short deadlines in high-pressure situations
Experience with GIS software, technology, and analytics
Knowledge of law enforcement and intelligence community systems, analytics, methods, legal authorities, or access controls
TS/SCI clearance
Clearance: Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",466,Washington
6,Senior Data Scientist,NT Concepts,"Chantilly, VA",None,"As a Senior Data Scientist on our solutions delivery team, you will have the unique opportunity to work on programs advancing the digital transformation of critical government systems. This program drives market-leading data science solutions for a customer in the Intelligence Community.

Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops (DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to ""automate-first"", use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.

If large-scale, data-driven projects resonate with you, and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let's connect.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires an advanced level of experience, a passion for exploring and pushing the boundaries on data, and a strong desire to solve our customers' hardest technical and data challenges.

The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for the following:

Driving decision-making with data-driven models

Enabling the mission through the synthesizing and analysis of large data sets

Leading data science efforts on a diverse team of cross functional skill sets

Decomposing complex analytical approaches and findings into meaningful studies and presentations

Assessing the effectiveness of the customer's program through qualitative and quantitative analysis

Leading the identification and collection of mission data

QUALIFICATIONS

Ability to synthesize and analyze large data sets and cross functioning information

Proficiency in open source research

Capability to work independently or on a team

Advanced proficiency in R and / or Python

TS/SCI + Full Scope Polygraph required

We're looking for a motivated Senior Data Scientist eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:

Have a meaningful impact on the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly

Develop your own career path through our What's Next program, which emphasizes personal growth through training and certification

Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world

Work in a fun, ""challenging yet rewarding"" fast-paced environment

Physical Requirements:
Prolonged periods sitting at a desk and working on a computer

Must be able to lift up to 10-15 pounds at times.

#CJ

#JT",466,Washington
7,Senior Data Scientist,Anne Lewis Strategies,"Washington, DC",None,"At Anne Lewis Strategies, we help clients create revolutionary digital strategies that advance their mission, change our country, and have a positive impact on the world.
We’re digital-obsessed, tech-savvy do-gooders who care deeply about social change. We’ve brought digital strategies to life for nonprofit organizations working around the world, including Save the Children, Sandy Hook Promise, and Friends of the Earth, as well as progressive political organizations, including presidential, Congressional, and gubernatorial campaigns.

We’re an equal-opportunity employer and take seriously our commitment to equality and equity. Our efforts to be inclusive and create opportunity don’t end when someone joins us – they begin.
We’ve set our sights on changing the world through our work and with our clients, and representation is at the foundation of what we do. We know that diversity of thought and background makes us stronger. That’s why we’re committed to building and maintaining a diverse community.
Every new team member broadens our perspective and allows us to think bigger. We’ll be at our best when people from underrepresented communities and people with a range of perspectives and lived experiences want to come, stay, and push the boundaries of what’s possible.
Overview: We are looking for a mid-level to senior Data Scientist to join us in bringing machine learning to online fundraising through our AdvantageAI product. The models you create will improve the lives of people throughout the world by empowering digital donors and activists to support our mission-driven clients. You’ll be driving positive change as part of a team of data scientists and engineers developing first-of-their-kind machine-learning products.
You’ll join an engineering team that is deeply devoted to inclusion, particularly in the following three areas:
Process: We create a context in which everyone is empowered to contribute.
Machine Learning: We are committed to identifying and removing bias from our algorithms.
Philanthropy: We empower diverse groups of individuals to participate in giving.
With us, you’ll put your skills to use for innovation that powers social good. We want your ideas and your leadership. Join us. Let’s go.
You will be responsible for:
Joining each and every one of your colleagues in creating an inclusive workspace;
Developing and enhancing the core models that power the AdvantageAI platform, supporting digital donor acquisition and UX optimization;
Designing experiments to determine how to maximize client goals, such as philanthropic donation or email activation;
Developing and supporting the development of infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a variety of data sources;
Working to constantly improve data reliability and quality;
Collaborating with cross-functional teams to support their data infrastructure needs.
Must-have qualifications:
3-5 years of professional experience in designing and implementing machine learning solutions to business problems;
A passion for statistical methodology, including an ability to unpack the assumptions and interpretations of various approaches, an openness and critical eye to the latest techniques, and a willingness to lead collaborations to find optimal solutions;
Experience with SQL to write nuanced analytic queries;
High-level familiarity with big data tools using AWS or other cloud services;
Attention to detail;
Intellectual curiosity to innovate on ways to solve data management issues.
Nice-to-have qualifications:
Working knowledge of Pandas and ideally PySpark;
Experience deploying deep learning models;
Experience managing data warehouses and/or data lakes;
Ability to build and optimize data pipelines, architectures, and data sets;
Experience working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.
If you feel you can do the job and are excited about this opportunity but are not sure if you meet all the qualifications, consider applying anyway. We’d love to hear from you!",466,Washington
8,National Airspace System Senior Data Scientist,Mitre Corporation,"McLean, VA",None,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.
The National Airspace System Future Vision and Research Department is currently seeking a motivated, creative Senior Data Scientist with interest and experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) in the aerospace domain to develop innovative solutions and make evidence-based recommendations to help the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) chart the future of aviation.
The Future Vision and Research department is shaping and maturing the evolutionary concepts that will lead the FAA and the aerospace domain to a safe, efficient, and agile operation in the future. As a Senior Data Scientist in this department, you will be working in the public interest to apply your knowledge and expertise to analyze and develop solutions for challenges such as improving aircraft trajectory modeling and performance models through the application of ML and applying AI to improve Traffic Flow Management (TFM) decision support systems. These activities contribute to achieving the department’s mission to design and evaluate new operational concepts while working in partnership with industry and government to address aviation’s most challenging emerging problems.
Our employees are empowered to work on multiple projects, cross-pollinate across teams, and bring forward new ideas in a continuous learning environment.
To be successful you will:
Passionately apply your Data Science skills and experience to help the FAA chart the future of aviation
Use your curiosity and interest to understand and solve complex problems using objective and quantitative methods
Work directly with government sponsors and industry to gain an understanding of their challenges, evaluate solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses
Communicate results and recommendations in an intuitive, actionable manner
Work on projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization
Required Education/Experience/Skills/Certifications:
Bachelor’s degree with 5+ years of experience, Master’s degree with 3+ years of experience, or Doctorate degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Aerospace Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics or similar field
Interest and experience in Aviation and Aerospace domain
Experience with common analytics software and tools such as RStudio, Python, and Tableau
Creative thinker with the ability to function in a dynamic, fast-moving environment
Excellent communication skills, both written an oral, of particularly complex and interconnected concepts
Applicants selected for this position must meet eligibility requirements for suitability
Desired Education/Experience/Skills/Certifications:
Experience supporting the FAA or other aviation industry stakeholders in a technical capacity
Experience working with and leading multi-disciplined teams
Experience with applying AI/ML to complex problems, including initial design through hands-on application
History of routine socialization and publication of work in journals and conference proceedings
Experience and understanding of aerospace vehicle flight dynamics and trajectory modeling
This requisition requires the following clearance(s):
Suitability - FAA
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.
Copyright © 1997-2021, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",466,Washington
9,Senior Data Scientist - Natural Language Processing,QS-2,"Bethesda, MD 20816",None,"QS-2 is seeking a Senior Data Scientist with demonstrated experience in Natural Language Processing (NLP) and text analytics to support the development and management of current and planned advanced research and development (R&D) programs for the U.S. Intelligence Community (IC).
Primary responsibilities:
Monitor and assess developments in emerging science and engineering technologies
Interact with world leaders in both industry and academia
Facilitate and orchestrate collaborative engagement among various teams with other technologies currently under development within related programs
Maintain and leverage technical expertise to provide clients with strategic assessments of new technologies and develop technical research programs
Interact with top scientists and engineers to guide their research toward new and revolutionary advances
Create technical reports, communicate findings to stakeholders, track and guide technical progress of client contracts, and perform other related tasks as required by the client
Engage with end users and customers to transition technologies, including maintaining cooperative engagements and facilitating stakeholder engagements
QUALIFICATIONS
Desired Qualifications:
M.S. (Ph.D. strongly preferred) in computer science, computational linguistics, information theory, or other relevant field
Postdoctoral or equivalent industry experience and/or significant research experience in Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, and Natural Language Processing
Well-versed in information extraction and information retrieval, including current state of the art and emerging approaches
Experience with multi-lingual natural language processing is preferred
Experience with human-in-the-loop computation is preferred
Ability to obtain a US Government TS/SCI w/CI Poly security clearance. Active clearance preferred.
Relocation to the Washington, DC metro area
Additional Qualifications:
Experience in providing technical program management
Experience interacting with research and development teams and organization
Experience in developing and/or managing test & evaluation approaches and teams
Strong technical writing skills
Ability to communicate complex scientific ideas to broad audiences, digest basic and applied research across areas of biotechnology, and apply to IC capability gaps
Ability and willingness to explore scientific literature for emerging technologies and learn completely new research subjects
yHZ5pib7Xn",466,Washington
10,"Senior Associate, Federal Data Scientist",KPMG,"McLean, VA 22102",None,"Innovate. Collaborate. Build. Create. Solve. The KPMG Digital Lighthouse is KPMG's award-winning Analytics & AI Center of Excellence recognized by clients and leading analyst firms in the US and globally. The KPMG Lighthouse is a curation of specialized technical capabilities and domain experts working across the digital landscape: applied data science, AI, data engineering and insights, software engineering, automation, and big data. Here, you'll be an important part of our high-energy, unique, fast-paced, and innovative culture that delivers with the agility of a tech startup and the backing of a leading global consulting firm. Our technology-agnostic approach enables us to scale up or down and integrate across leading platforms.
KPMG is currently seeking a Senior Associate to join our Federal Advisory practice.
Responsibilities:
Support Data Science and Machine Learning intensive engagements with a primary focus on client delivery and project management of teams with Data Scientists, Data Engineers, Business Consultants and translate advanced business analytics problems into technical approaches that yield actionable recommendations, in diverse domains (product development, marketing research, supply chain, technology process, and public policy)
Undertake necessary statistical analysis using Natural Language Processing to mine unstructured data, using a variety of methods (document clustering, topic analysis, names entity recognition, document classification, and sentiment analysis) as part of the overall Machine Learning initiative set forth for the engagement
Analyze structured and unstructured data, understand and implement algorithms, and support analysis using advanced statistical and mathematical methods form emerging areas in pattern analysis, machine learning, deep learning, data mining, econometrics, and operations research
Support workshops around emerging technologies in associated areas of Machine Learning, with both business clients and technical clients utilizing processes and best practices to plan, lead, and execute delivery of artificial intelligence engagements across different areas (technology, financial services, emerging tech, government agencies - federal, state, local, and utilities)
Function in a fast-paced and dynamic environment utilizing virtual and face-to-face interactions; manage complex work streams, expectations, budgets, deliverables, risks, and multiple responsibilities using structured approaches for operational excellence while communicating results to executive level audiences
Plan and manage objectives and key deliverables using analytics processes to mitigate risks in data, modeling, validation, and delivery
Qualifications:
A minimum of three years of technical data science experience; U.S. Federal government consulting experience
Bachelor's degree from an accredited college/university
Experience performing data science from data discovery, cleaning, model selection, validation, and deployment; experience coding artificial intelligence methods using object-oriented programming in a software development process, and ability to restructure, refactor, and optimize code for efficiency
Problem-solving ability through the use and/or development of data science algorithms, models, testing, etc.; ability to utilize a diverse array of technologies and tools as needed, to deliver insights, such as R, Python, Spark, Hadoop and emerging Cloud Capabilities on Azure, GCP and/or AWS; experience with command-line scripting, data structures, and algorithms
Ability to travel as required to support firm engagements
U.S. citizenship required and an active U.S. Federal government Secret security clearance
KPMG LLP (the U.S. member firm of KPMG International) offers a comprehensive compensation and benefits package. KPMG is an affirmative action-equal opportunity employer. KPMG complies with all applicable federal, state and local laws regarding recruitment and hiring. All qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other category protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. The attached link contains further information regarding the firm's compliance with federal, state and local recruitment and hiring laws. No phone calls or agencies please.",466,Washington
11,"Safety Data Scientist, Senior",Mitre Corporation,"McLean, VA",None,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.
MITRE's The Safety Concepts & Evolution department is looking for a Senior Safety Data Scientist to join their team. Responsibilities include:
Engineering and analysis applied to transportation safety in particular aviation safety, public private partnership, data sharing, data governance, data taxonomy, data analytics
Evaluating concepts and establishing requirements for safety analytics, risk analysis, risk estimation, target level of safety
Basic Qualifications:
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances
BS degree in engineering
5 years of related experience
Ability to work independently, communicate effectively in written and verbal modes, and to provide operational subject matter expertise and leadership to transportation safety division
Ability to multi-task and work multiple projects simultaneously
Complex thinking and innovation skills
Required Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in engineering
10+ years experience with aeronautical/aviation engineering applied to data science, data management
Requirements analysis, concept engineering, development of use cases, data schemas, strategies
Data analysis methods and tool use, data visualization
Preferred Qualifications:
Engineering with emphasis on data science
Creative problem solver with the ability to think holistically about challenges and potential solutions
This requisition requires the following clearance(s):
None
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.
Copyright © 1997-2021, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",466,Washington
12,"Advanced Data Scientist, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Explore and use data sources through the use and analysis of scientific processes and technologies to uncover and communicate business insights. Apply leading-edge principles, theories, and concepts and contribute to the development of new principles and concepts. Work on unusually complex problems and provide highly innovative solutions. Operate with substantial latitude for unreviewed action or decision and mentor or supervise employees in both firm and technical competencies.
Basic Qualifications:
5 years of experience with leading data science teams through complex data challenges
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree
Certified Analytics Professional (CAP)
Additional Qualifications:
Experience with homeland security mission spaces
Active Secret clearance
MA or MS degree
Vendor specific certifications, including Google Professional Data Engineer Certification or IBM Data Science Professional Certificate
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",466,Washington
13,Sr. Data Scientist,Deloitte,"Rosslyn, VA 22209 (Radnor-Ft Myer Heights area)",None,"Are you an analytical, data-driven professional? Are you interested in a role that offers an opportunity to provide front line support to our clients instead of a ""back office programmer"" position? If so, Deloitte's Government and Public Services (GPS) Analytics team is the place for you! Join our team of specialists as they unlock insights contained in the data universe and work through challenges related to the identification of improper payments, data quality, mission-oriented analysis, and cost management.
Work you'll do
In this role, you will specialize in and provide expertise in data analytics, data science/engineering, and data management. Other responsibilities include:
Participate in and/or lead the development of deliverable content that meets the needs of the client and contract
Anticipate client needs and formulate solutions to client issues
Review deliverables for accuracy and quality
Manage own personal and professional development; seek opportunities for professional growth and expansion of consulting skills and experience
Serve as a ""Subject Matter Expert"", adding interpretive value to data presented or experienced insight into a functional process or issue
Identify and solve the data-analytics problems related to client's mission
Work with mission analysts to help identify, clean and validate various data sets to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity
The Team
Transparency, innovation, collaboration, sustainability: these are the hallmark issues shaping GPS initiatives today. Deloitte's GPS practice is passionate about making an impact with lasting change. Carrying out missions in the GPS practice requires fresh thinking and a creative approach. We collaborate with teams from across our organization in order to bring the full breadth of Deloitte, its commercial and public sector expertise, to best support our clients. Our aspiration is to be the premier integrated solutions provider in helping to transform the GPS marketplace.
Deloitte GPS Analytics mitigates current and future risk for our GPS clients across several industries, spanning from finance and audit readiness to forensics and healthcare. With a creative and innovative approach, our Analytics team exposes our clients' risks and provides recommendations to improve the quality of data. We collaborate closely with government agencies, accountants, IT professionals, and clients to produce analyses in support of risk consulting engagements.
Qualifications
Required:

Eligible to obtain and maintain the required clearance for this role
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future
Bachelor's Degree in Economics, Finance, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Management Information Systems, Engineering, Business Analytics disciplines, or related area
years of experience with data quality analysis, statistical analysis and/or modeling, data cleansing and data engineering
Experience mining and analyzing transactional electronic data with competency in one or more of the following: SAS, SQL, SPSS, R, Python, ACP, IDEA Tableau, MATLAB, Visual Basic, Business Intelligence, Hadoop or Alteryx
Preferred:

Previous Federal Consulting and/or professional services experience
Applied knowledge of AWS/cloud development and solutions architecture
Displays both breadth and depth of knowledge regarding functional and technical issues
Experience presenting to clients or other decision makers to present and sell ideas to various audiences (technical and non-technical)
How you'll grow
At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there's always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs at Deloitte University, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career. Explore Deloitte University, The Leadership Center.
Benefits
At Deloitte, we know that great people make a great organization. We value our people and offer employees a broad range of benefits. Learn more about what working at Deloitte can mean for you.
Deloitte's culture
Our positive and supportive culture encourages our people to do their best work every day. We celebrate individuals by recognizing their uniqueness and offering them the flexibility to make daily choices that can help them to be healthy, centered, confident, and aware. We offer well-being programs and are continuously looking for new ways to maintain a culture where our people excel and lead healthy, happy lives. Learn more about Life at Deloitte.
Corporate citizenship
Deloitte is led by a purpose: to make an impact that matters. This purpose defines who we are and extends to relationships with our clients, our people and our communities. We believe that business has the power to inspire and transform. We focus on education, giving, skill-based volunteerism, and leadership to help drive positive social impact in our communities. Learn more about Deloitte's impact on the world.
Recruiter tips
We want job seekers exploring opportunities at Deloitte to feel prepared and confident. To help you with your interview, we suggest that you do your research: know some background about the organization and the business area you're applying to. Check out recruiting tips from Deloitte professionals.",466,Washington
14,Senior Data Analyst,US Federal Trade Commission,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Division of Consumer Response and Operations (DCRO) in the Bureau of Consumer Protection (BCP) at the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) in Washington, D.C. BCP, through its consumer protection work in seven divisions and eight FTC regional offices, carries out the Commission's mandate to protect the American public from unfair and deceptive acts and practices in commerce.
Responsibilities
If selected for this position, you will provide intelligence to both FTC and external law enforcement authorities concerning consumer complaints, law enforcement actions and other data maintained by the FTC. As part of your responsibilities, you will support the Consumer Sentinel Network (CSN). Consumer Sentinel is a secure Internet web site available to law enforcement authorities throughout the United States and Canada. It includes a searchable data bank of consumer complaints received by the FTC and external data contributors, as well as a host of other information concerning telemarketing, unsolicited commercial email and identity theft.

To support this program, you will perform the following duties:

Develop methods to extract data from CSN or from data obtained during the course of investigations and to transmit this information to the appropriate internal and external users, including FTC management and staff at all levels as well as external parties including members of Congress, other government agencies, FOIA requesters and media outlets.Leverage analytics and visualization tools (Tableau) to present information in a way that drives fact based decision-making.Develop new analytical reports and represent large, complex sets of data through visual representation.Automate and optimize data extraction, cleaning, processing and analysis functions.
- Query and mine large data sets, including text data, to discover patterns, using traditional or advanced techniques such as machine learning.- Regularly use various relational databases, SQL Server, MYSQL, etc to query databases.
Use python (pandas, numpy), R or other programing languages to analyze large datasets of structured or unstructured data.Energetically work with teams to create data products for a wide-range of stakeholders.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. citizenship requirement must be met by the closing date of this vacancy.
Position is subject to a background investigation.
Males born after December 31, 1959 must register with Selective Service.
You may serve a one-year probationary period under this appointment.
R?sum? and supporting documents (See How To Apply).
This position is in the bargaining unit.
Qualifications
To qualify for a Senior Data Analyst at the GS-13 level, you must meet the following requirements:

Applicants must have (1) year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-12 level using data analysis tools (sql, python, R, etc) to build and execute data queries against databases with large volumes of data, extract and wrangle large datasets (over 1,000,000 records) and present results to internal audiences or external audiences, and a solid understanding of data science fundamentals.

To qualify for a Senior Data Analyst at the GS-14 level, you must meet the following requirements:

Applicants must have (1) year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-13 level using data analysis tools (sql, python, R, etc) to build and execute data queries against databases with large volumes of data, extract and wrangle large datasets (over 1,000,000 records) and present results to internal audiences or external audiences, and a solid understanding of data science fundamentals, managing large data related projects from start through completion, and/ or planning, development, execution and maintenance of all project aspects.



Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
This position does not have an education requirement.
Additional information
If you are a veteran with preference eligibility and are claiming 5-points veterans' preference, you must submit a copy of your DD-214 or other proof of eligibility. If you are claiming 10-point veterans' preference, you must also submit an SF-15, ""Application for 10-Point Veterans' Preference"" plus the proof required by that form. For more information on veterans' preference visit: VETERANS GUIDE


Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service (see SELECTIVE SERVICE).


Career Transition Assistance Programs: These programs apply to employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service or Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: (1) meet CTAP or ICTAP eligibility criteria; (2) be rated well-qualified for the position with a score of 87 or above; and, (3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility. For more information visit: CAREER TRANSITION.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the announcement has closed, a review of your résumé and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the qualification requirements listed on this announcement. If you are minimally qualified, your résumé and supporting documentation will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your level of experience. If, after reviewing your résumé and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and/or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully when applying, errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

All qualified candidates will be assigned to a quality category.


Best-Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that substantially exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate high proficiency in all of the critical competencies.

Well-Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrates acceptable proficiency in all of the critical competencies.

Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that meets the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate basic proficiency in most of the critical competencies.

Veterans: Qualified veterans who have a compensable service-connected disability of at least 10% are listed in the best-qualified category, except when the position being filled is scientific or professional at the GS-09 grade level, or higher. Other 10-point preference eligibles and veterans with 5-point preference who meet the eligibility and qualification requirements are placed above non-preference eligibles within the category in which they qualify. View information on veterans' preference.

The category assignment is a measure of the degree in which your background matches the competencies required for this position. Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Moderate Risk (MR)
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you must submit a complete Application Package which includes:

1. Your résumé showing work schedule, hours worked per week, dates of employment and duties performed.

2. Other supporting documents:

Cover Letter, optional

College Transcript(s), if qualifying based on education

Veterans' Preference documentation, if applicable (e.g., DD-214 Member Copy 4 showing type of discharge/character of service, SF-15 Form and related documentation, VA letter, etc.)

Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable (e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.)

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Individuals with disabilities
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
All U.S. Citizens",466,Washington
15,Senior Data Analyst,GEICO,"Chevy Chase, MD 20815",None,"The Data Consumption team of Data, Security & Infrastructure (DSI) department is seeking a highly motivated Senior Data Analyst to start or continue an IT career at GEICO on the Big Data project.
Teaming up with software engineers, scrum masters, leads, managers and directors, you will work in an Agile environment to make application data ingested from various partner systems consumable on the Big Data Atomic Layer.
In this role, you will coordinate with a variety of IT departments to elicit and translate high level business requirements into detailed system requirements. You will participate in the entire software development lifecycle by writing and executing test plans, finding solutions to issues during development and after deployment. You should be intellectually curious, have a solutions-oriented attitude and enjoy learning new tools and techniques.
Requirements Qualifications:
5+ years knowledge of Data transformation, Data management & ETL processes
5+ years’ experience documenting business and system requirements, processes, workflows and test plans
5+ years’ experience with Relational Database (Snowflake, Hive, Microsoft SQL, Oracle or DB2)
3+ years’ experience on writing queries using SQL
3+ years’ working knowledge of Data Vault modelling, Azure DevOps, Hadoop, Hive, Microsoft Power BI, and Python
3+ years’ working knowledge of Big Data and the Azure/Snowflake ecosystem
Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
Assists developers with more complex and detailed projects including root cause analysis, gap analysis etc.
Excellent time management skills and attention to detail is required
Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
Strong problem-solving ability, critical thinking skills, creative/innovative thinking
Ability and desire to learn new skills and techniques
Ability to thrive while working on ambiguous or challenging projects
A Bachelor's degree in a computer or information technology or currently enrolled in a degree program
Desirable Qualifications:
Proficient in SQL and be able to extract & validate data using SQL query
Ability to work independently while supporting multiple projects in a dynamic environment
Understanding of software development, web technologies, and testing approaches
Ability to discern data inaccuracies through technical experience and knowledge.
Develop an understanding of the business and the data needed to promote success
Ability to query, organize and interpret large amounts of data
Research data from key business systems, assess data quality, and map data to requirements for analysis and reporting
Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.
As a Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:
Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
Tuition Reimbursement
Paid Training and LicensuresBenefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
**Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.
The equal employment opportunity policy of the GEICO Companies provides for a fair and equal employment opportunity for all associates and job applicants regardless of race, color, religious creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, familial status, disability or genetic information, in compliance with applicable federal, state and local law. GEICO hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.
GEICO reasonably accommodates qualified individuals with disabilities to enable them to receive equal employment opportunity and/or perform the essential functions of the job, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship to the Company. This applies to all applicants and associates.
GEICO also provides a work environment in which each associate is able to be productive and work to the best of their ability. We do not condone or tolerate an atmosphere of intimidation or harassment. We expect and require the cooperation of all associates in maintaining an atmosphere free from discrimination and harassment with mutual respect by and for all associates and applicants.
#LI-AA1
#LI-AA3
#DI-AA",466,Washington
16,Senior Statistician,All In Solutions,"Washington, DC 20006 (Foggy Bottom area)","$140,000 - $200,000 a year","StatisticianEducation:  Ph.D.Years of Experience:  5 YearsBrief Description: This program is in support of the Department of Veterans Affairs, to develop methods to determine the return on investment (ROI) of the GI Bill using outcome measures and to identify, obtain, and analyze, data on the GI Bill populations. Experience working on Federal Government Contracts is a plus. Experience either using or an understanding of the GI Bill is also a plus.The Statistician provides the mathematical basis for data-based conclusions. They decide what data is required to answer specific questions and problems. The Statistician applies mathematical theories and techniques, designs data collection, develops mathematical and statistical models, Interprets data, and reports conclusions drawn from analysis.Responsibilities: Interface with various database platforms to pull data and link them logically; know how to deal with the inherent structure of the data.Use SAS and/or R to perform standard statistical analysis, profiling, reporting and model implementation.Build statistical models, such as linear or logistic regression, survival and other parametric or non-parametric models that predict various business metrics.Summarize and present results for non-technical client audience.Work with senior Analytics personnel to develop new methods for statistical analysis and visualization.QualificationsPhd in Statistics, Applied Math, Econometrics or closely related field.5 years of work experience.3 or more academic publications in the past 5 years.A deep understanding of various statistical methods, such as linear and logistic regression, time series, design of experiments, etc. Experience with survival analysis (i.e. censored data) is preferred.Statistical programming experience: SAS programming and ability to use base SAS and SQL to deal with various analytical and data processing tasks, and/or; R programming and ability to use R statistical, reporting and database packages to deal with various analytical and data processing tasksExperience working with large datasets and complex relational data modelsEffective oral and written communication skillsExperience providing Project Management on Federal Government ProgramsStrong interpersonal skillsUnited States Work Authorization is RequiredJob Type: Full-timePay: $140,000.00 - $200,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayApplication Question(s):How many academic publications have you published in the past 5 years?Education:Doctorate (Required)Experience:statistical modeling: 5 years (Required)Power BI: 1 year (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Yes",466,Washington
17,"Data Scientist, Senior",TENICA and Associates LLC,"Springfield, VA 22150",None,"TENICA is looking to hire a Senior Data Scientist in Springfield, VA. MUST HAVE TS/SCI.

Develop and conduct algorithm quality trade studies related to synthetic aperture radar imagery, identifying best use cases for selected algorithms, and characterizing performance of algorithms when used outside the best use case scenarios. Prototype an analytical procedure that will generate confidence values based on algorithm outputs. Refine the verification and validation process for analytics. Enhance existing models to leverage analytic output for driving automated tasking. Develop scripts for running and testing the algorithms and analytics, using programs such as Databricks, Python, and Jupyter Notebook. Make presentations and reports at the request of the government in addition to a task kick off, midpoint review, and final report and presentation.

Experience in at least two of the following areas is required: Mathematics/Statistics; Computer Science; Domain Expertise/ Analysis; and Presentation.9 years of experience and a MA/MS degree. In place of the degree, may substitute 19 years of relevant work experience. Desirable skills and experience include synthetic aperture radar image science or analysis; other remote sensing imaging such as multispectral; programming and script development; data science; Python, Databricks, Jupyter Notebook; Intelligence Community analytical workflows.",466,Washington
18,Senior Analyst Data Scientist Supply Chain,Nestle USA,"Arlington, VA",None,"Foods people love. Brands people trust. And a career that nourishes future like no other!

At Nestlé USA we are committed to providing high quality products that are essential to living well. As individuals and teams, we are empowered to make meaningful contributions that positively impact our families, communities, and planet. With our portfolio of global brands, the opportunities to innovate and grow are limitless. As the world's leading food and beverage company, our focus is not only about delighting our customers, it's about enriching you!

Position Summary – Your Impact
The Senior Data Scientist will utilize a blended approach of statistical, predictive, and optimization modeling methodologies to lead new analytical approaches and develop recommendations to solve a broad spectrum of Operational Supply Chain challenges. The overall objective is to imbed advanced analytical solutions into everyday decision support tools, with the goal of enabling diagnostic evaluation, predictive planning, and prescriptive decision making in everyday problem solving across the end-to-end supply chain functions.
Assist in model development, evaluation, and deployment to support operational decision making across Nestlé's Supply Chain.
Introduce Machine Learning methodologies across a wide breadth of business use cases.
Acquire deep understanding of business problems and translate them into appropriate mathematical depictions.
Act as an internal consultant by integrating with departmental customers to identify opportunities, scope and define the business problems, performing data analysis, and generate self-service solutions to address needs.
Interpret the results, draw conclusions, and present findings / recommendations to appropriate groups to help identify actionable steps to be taken by Supply Chain cross-functional and leadership teams.
Mentor more junior staff, guide predictive model development across team, define how customers use the models, and train users on integration.

Primary Responsibilities – What You'll Do
Responsibilities and essential job functions include but are not limited to the following:

Modeling
Test and implement the advanced analytics methods to derive insights that drive business growth
Drive the execution of AI solutions to address business needs
Drive EA priorities through rapid piloting and scaling of next gen technologies
Incorporate the latest data science thinking into NUSA's solutions and models
Collect, cleanse, and understand complex data sources to enable proper analytical modeling
Research, design, develop, test, and implement data science methodologies across a wide range of business applications.
Define and develop programming for self-service decision support solutions that leverage predictive, prescriptive, and scenario optimization tactics.

Project Management
Manage Special Projects, Pilots, Proof of Concepts, and Ad-hoc project work
Participate in the evaluation, intake, design, and integration strategy between multiple Supply Chain functions and data sources for varying Nestlé businesses.
Conduct proper stakeholder management to ensure all parties are aligned and updated throughout project life cycle
Design and build advanced visualization tools that will simplify the outputs of the models, with the goal of being integrated into a self-service operational model across the business stakeholders.
Develop professional presentations and project status reporting appropriate for their intended audience.

Training / Development
Coach analysts in addressing modeling issues identified by the business stakeholders. Provide analytics knowledge and support to the Supply Chain business network.

A few potential analytics areas you will be involved in are listed below.
Recommendation Engine (e.g. Supply Chain Recommendation Engine)
Predictive Scenario Planning (e.g. Future business performance, drivers and scenarios)
Prescriptive Optimization (e.g. Network Optimization)
Integrated Forecasting (e.g. Demand Forecasting)
Intelligent Automation

Your Team – Who You'll Work With
Work with Director, EA Advanced Analytics to generate innovative, cross-functional solutions which comprehensively address the asks of the business
Collaborate with Analytics, and Insights teams at EA, and business functions across portfolio of analytics projects
Requirements and Minimum Education Level
Undergraduate Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Business or a similar field. Master's degree preferred
3+ years of experience using various programming languages (R, Python etc.) to develop and apply advanced cognitive or machine learning methods and algorithms to address business priorities, with focus on consumer products preferred

Necessary Skills & Qualifications
Business acumen (strong understanding of how business operates, and how to harness data and analytics to meet business needs).
Ability to develop and deploy advanced analytical models and algorithms that drive profitable growth at NUSA.
Strong working knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (Regression, Clustering, Decision Tree, Probability Networks, AI, Machine Learning, Neural Networks, Bayesian models etc.).
Proficient with one or more programming language such as R, Python.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for partners using PowerBI and/or Tableau
Passion for solving complex data problems and generating cross-functional solutions in a fast-paced environment
Proven examples of developing, selling, and sharing modeling concepts across team members to drive adoption and implementation beyond personal use
Experience in a mentorship type role, focused on driving contribution beyond own models and projects
Good facilitation and presentation skills, including training delivery.
Excellent oral and written communication skills, organizational and time-management abilities.
High initiative, self-starter, and able to work with limited supervision.
The Nestlé Companies are an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer seeking diversity in qualified applicants for employment. All applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",466,Washington
19,"Data Engineer, Senior",Parsons,"Centreville, VA 20120",None,"Minimum Clearance Required to Start:
Secret
Job Description:
The Data Engineer, Senior supports Data Scientists by developing, maintaining, and testing data generating infrastructures and transforming the resulting data into formats that can be easily analyzed. The Data Engineer ascertains the meaning and usefulness of data within the context of the program's needs and communicates that information to various teams within the program. Works with knowledge-based systems (KBSs) that incorporate artificial intelligence into data mining, data entry, calculation tasks, and decision-making applications. The Senior level position is expected to provide technical leadership, planning, and implementation of their assigned efforts and will routinely provide guidance to Junior and Journeyman level positions.
Responsibilities:
Designing, building, and installing data infrastructure systems that input data into machine learning Artificial Intelligence analytic systems, taking into consideration data formatting, scalability, system resiliency, and security
Developing data acquisition, data transformation and data modeling systems and algorithms
Developing algorithms to translate, prepare, format data to optimize utilization of the data by machine learning and artificial intelligence engines
Requirements:
Master's degree in related technical field or equivalent experience
10+ years of related professional experience
Must be able to obtain, maintain and/or currently possess a security clearance.",466,Washington
20,Federal - Data Scientist - Senior,Accenture,"Ashburn, VA 20147",None,"Organization: Accenture Federal ServicesLocation: Chantilly, VAWe are: Accenture Federal Services bring together commercial innovation with the latest technology to unleash the potential for our federal clients. Operating in the nation’s Capital, we stay ahead of what is coming next. Drawing from the power of Accenture, we deliver integrated, mobile and interactive experiences that exceed our people’s expectations. Join us where ideas are freely exchanged, and concepts evolve into practical solutions.You are: An inventor and a problem-solver. Curious and future-focused, you are always looking to dive deep into new technologies and meaningfully apply them. You are ready to work with engineers and stakeholders to create intelligent solutions for clients.The work:• Work with clients to create questions and define technology opportunities• Drive the exploration of data sources and analytic techniques to create newmodeling approaches• Work with large data sets to solve complex problems• Apply statistical methods to develop analytic models

Here's what you need:• Experience with Python and/or R Programming Language• Experience with SQL or similar database language• Experience with analytics, statistical modeling, optimization, machine learning, and/or artificial intelligence• Experience in consulting or similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery• Experience extracting, aggregating, and structuring data along different dimensionsBonus points:• You have experience with visualization (e.g. Power BI, Tableau, MicroStrategy, d3.js)• You have experience with machine learning frameworks (e.g. TensorFlow, Scikit-Learn, Spark)• You have experience with RDBMS (MariaDB, PostgreSQL, Oracle)• You have experience with Agile MethodologyImportant InformationApplicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture Federal Services.Accenture Federal Services is an EEO and Affirmative Action Employer of Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.Equal Employment Opportunity: All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.Accenture Federal Services is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.An active security clearance or the ability to obtain one may be required for this role.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",466,Washington
21,Senior Data Scientist,MAXIMUS,"McLean, VA 22102",None,"Job Description Summary WD USA:

Who We Seek:

Passion Seekers. You genuinely care about the work that you do and its impact on society.Self-Starters. You’re a go-getter who isn’t afraid to step up and disrupt the status quo.Entrepreneurs. You bring fresh ideas to the table, work hard, develop business and consistently seek new challenges.Collaborators. You’re a great contributor to a high performing team that accomplishes great feats for our clients.

What You Will Do:

This position supports application development efforts as a Senior Data Scientist. As a Senior Data Scientist, you will be providing all the necessary technical expertise to architect, design, and model data including providing advanced and predictive data analytics from complex and high value projects using big data and data science technology for overarching enterprise. You will also be responsible for providing thought leadership for our clients while providing technical oversight for solution deployment engagements.
Â Job Summary:

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Assist with architecture and design data approaches and solutions for a large set of dataUnderstands and improves how data is modeled against the program Logical Data ModelUnderstands and improves how data is sourced from different sources and ingested with the data integration solutionEnsures that enterprise architects are addressing all data requirements in their respective projects and solutionsLead technical engagements to assess client business and technical objectives, determine deliverables, evaluate risk and execute projects effectively.Design enterprise-class security systems for a production environmentAlign standards, frameworks and security with overall business and technology strategyIdentify and communicate current and emerging security threatsConduct Design Workshops with multiple stakeholdersIdentify security design gaps in existing and proposed architectures and recommend changes or enhancementsWork with Service Design management to develop strategic plans for architecture, engineering, integration, and dashboardProvide reporting and feedback to senior management as requiredWork as part of a team throughout the software development life cycleCollaborate with designers and analysts to provide Engineering and Sustainment services in Development, Security and Operations activitiesShare best practices and improve processes within and across sprint teams, and mentor more junior developers
Required Skills:
Shall have at least 10 years of experience in enterprise data architecture and managementShall have at least eight (8) years of experience in Conceptual/Logical/Physical data modelingShall have experience in modeling solutions in AWS that us AI/ML algorithmsShall have at least ten (10) years of proven expertise in Relational and Dimensional Data ModelingMust have experience of cloud architecture, specifically AWS, as it relates to data processing (i.e., EC2, S3, Redshift, etc.)Must be able to define & maintain BI/Data Warehouse methodologies, standards, and industry best practicesShall have experience leading and architecting enterprise wide initiatives, specifically system integration, data warehouse build, data mart build, data lakes, etc. for a large enterpriseShall have experience briefing the benefits and constraints of technology solutions to technology partners, stakeholders, team members, and senior levels of managementShall have, at a minimum, a Bachelor’s degree in data science, engineering, statistics
Desired Skills:
Experience implementing technical solutions in complex and heterogeneous environmentsStrong understanding of the core principles of data science and machine learningAbility to analyze, summarize and characterize large or small data sets with varying degrees of fidelity or quality; able to identify and explain any insights or patterns within themSolid experience applying one or more of the following analytical methodsStrong understanding of and experience with advanced statistical theoretical knowledgeSolid experience in exploratory data analysis and visualizationExperience collaborating with Agencies to mature operational processes, reduce redundancies, and develop innovative solutionsStrong experience in ensuring customer satisfaction, problem resolution, and risk management on several medium to large projectsExperience in conducting assessments at an Enterprise by reviewing technical documentations, conducting interviews and workshops to identify gaps and developing a tailored solution is highly desiredProven ability to work across multiple functional teams in the creation of an application development processDemonstrated ability to build trusted advisor relationships with clientsExperience supporting sales and business developmentExperience with financial management
Years of Experience: 10+ years
Minimum Education Required: Bachelor’s Degree
Project/Position Introduction (MAX 500 Characters): Since 1975, Maximus has operated under its founding mission of Helping Government Serve the People, enabling citizens around the globe to successfully engage with their governments at all levels and across a variety of health and human services programs. Maximus delivers innovative business process management and technology solutions that contribute to improved outcomes for citizens and higher levels of productivity, accuracy, accountability and efficiency of government-sponsored programs. With more than 30,000 employees worldwide, Maximus is a proud partner to government agencies in the United States, Australia, Canada, Saudi Arabia, Singapore and the United Kingdom. For more information, visit https://www.maximus.com. EEO Statement: EEO Statement: Active military service members, their spouses, and veteran candidates often embody the core competencies Maximus deems essential, and bring a resiliency and dependability that greatly enhances our workforce. We recognize your unique skills and experiences, and want to provide you with a career path that allows you to continue making a difference for our country. We’re proud of our connections to organizations dedicated to serving veterans and their families. If you are transitioning from military to civilian life, have prior service, are a retired veteran or a member of the National Guard or Reserves, or a spouse of an active military service member, we have challenging and rewarding career opportunities available for you. A committed and diverse workforce is our most important resource. Maximus is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Maximus provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disabled status.",466,Washington
22,Senior Data Analysts,FiscalNote,"Washington, DC 20004 (Penn Quarter area)","$110,000 a year","About the Role
FiscalNote’s Senior Data Analysts are creating a cutting-edge product that allows organizations big and small to take control of their government strategy. We have the colossal task of making policy documents accessible accessible and actionable. Our data back-end interfaces with sources that are frequently brittle and obsolete to provide reliable, timely, and accurate information - at scale.
We are constantly expanding our platform backend to represent more policymaking activities of more branches of government across more jurisdictions. At the same time, we are creating new ways to retrieve and organize the millions of documents on our platform.
What to Expect in this Position:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Electronic Engineering, Computer Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or a related field or a foreign equivalence;
Minimum 3 years of experience working as data analyst or with databases through administration tools such as Toad;
Minimum 3 years of experience using Structured Query Language (SQL) to query relational database management systems (RDBMS), especially Oracle databases;
Minimum 3 years of experience integrating datasets with no unique identifiers through fuzzy matching functions such as SOUNDEX;
Minimum 3 years of experience creating test scripts using various tools and techniques to ensure accurate datasets are loaded into the system; and
Minimum 3 years of experience translating ambiguous business requirements into clear technical requirements.
What Sets You Apart:
Identify U.S. (e.g., regulation, legislation) and international data sources (e.g., France, India) to parse data to ingest into FN/CQ platforms, and analyze the data models for those data sets;
Evaluate primary and secondary data sets, merge, or filter strategies for data ingestion;
Work with development team in developing techniques/practices to filter and “clean” data sets in consultation with product team;
Identify and define new process improvements for data ingestion;
Work with software developers to create optimal and reusable data models;
Create testing scenarios and test scripts to check quality of data sets being injected into platform;
Ensure that data models and their implementation is consistent and standard;
Scale data ingestion with decreased time to platform across all datasets; and
Work with the product team in creating workflows/user experience with data sets.
OFFERED RATE OF PAY: $110,000.00 per year

THIS NOTICE IS BEING POSTED IN CONNECTION WITH THE FILING OF AN APPLICATION FOR PERMANENT ALIEN LABOR CERTIFICATION. ALL APPLICANTS SHOULD REPORT DIRECTLY TO THE EMPLOYER. ANY PERSON MAY PROVIDE DOCUMENTARY EVIDENCE BEARING ON THE APPLICATION TO THE REGIONAL CERTIFYING OFFICER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AT THE FOLLOWING ADDRESS:

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING ADMINISTRATION
HARRIS TOWER
233 PEACHTREE STREET, SUITE 410
ATLANTA, GA 30303
FiscalNote is continuing to hire new talent, with all interviewing and on-boarding done virtually due to COVID-19. New team members, along with our current staff, will temporarily work remotely (unless communicated otherwise).
At FiscalNote, we Lead with Values
Know your Audience Find the Truth Drive Alignment Level Up Own the Job Bias for Action Support the Family
FiscalNote is a technology-powered global software data and media company that uses powerful machine learning to provide clients with the right policy information and insights, and at the right time so that they can better navigate market risk and uncertainty and maximize new opportunities.
As the premier hub of domestic and global information for more than 5,000 clients worldwide, FiscalNote’s tools, analysis, news, and award-winning journalism delivers context, clarity, and a competitive edge in a rapidly changing world.
If your background and experience align with the competencies above, we encourage you to apply so that we can review your experience and learn more about how you can add to FiscalNote’s growth and success.
Company Benefits
FiscalNote offers competitive salaries, equity packages, and retirement accounts to ensure we’re all FN owners. We work hard, so our open vacation policy helps us ensure you’re getting the R&R you need. We offer comprehensive health, vision, and dental insurance options supplemented by a flexible spending account (FSA). We have a slew of other benefits which you can check out at careers.FiscalNote.com.
FiscalNote values diversity. We are committed to equal opportunities and creating an inclusive environment for all our employees. We welcome applicants regardless of ethnic origin, national origin, gender, race, religious beliefs, disability, sexual orientation or age. FiscalNote is an EEOC employer.
FiscalNote uses E-Verify to confirm the employment eligibility of all new employees. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, please visit www.DHS.gov/E-Verify.",466,Washington
23,"Advanced Data Scientist, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Explore and use data sources through the use and analysis of scientific processes and technologies to uncover and communicate business insights. Apply leading-edge principles, theories, and concepts and contribute to the development of new principles and concepts. Work on unusually complex problems and provide highly innovative solutions. Operate with substantial latitude for unreviewed action or decision and mentor or supervise employees in both firm and technical competencies.
Basic Qualifications:
5 years of experience with leading data science teams through complex data challenges
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree
Certified Analytics Professional (CAP)
Additional Qualifications:
Experience with homeland security mission spaces
Active Secret clearance
MA or MS degree
Vendor specific certifications, including Google Professional Data Engineer Certification or IBM Data Science Professional Certificate
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",466,Washington
24,Senior Data Scientist,The Voter Participation Center / Center for Voter...,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)","$90,000 - $110,000 a year","Position: Senior Data Scientist - Washington, DC or remoteReports to: Senior Director of Data Science & Analytics*Organization Description: The Voter Participation Center (VPC) is the nation’s largest non-partisan, non-profit organization dedicated to registering and mobilizing voters from the New American Majority (NAM) – people of color, unmarried women and young people – who make up the majority of the potential electorate but have been historically underrepresented in political participation and power. Using direct mail, digital and social media outreach, guided by rigorous data science and experimentation, and working closely with a multitude of partner organizations, VPC connects with millions of voters each year, building the foundation for a more representative democracy.Over 18 years VPC has helped more than 5.7 million people register to vote. In 2020, as COVID-19 shut down most forms of in-person voter contact, VPC helped more than 4.6 million people apply to vote by mail & cast ballots, registered more than 1.6 million people, and assisted millions of voters in voting early and safely to reduce pressures on polling places on Election Day.VPC programs are flexible, nimble and scalable. VPC is driven by a commitment to constant research, testing, experimentation and evaluation, and thus offers many of the most cost effective, proven, high-impact programs in the civic engagement field.The Center for Voter Information (CVI) is VPC’s partner organization, and is a separate but affiliated 501(c)4 non-profit that works to engage both the NAM as well as members of the broader electorate who share their values.Position Overview:  VPC and CVI seek a Senior Data Scientist who will be at the forefront of VPC and CVI’s effort to expand its analytics and research capabilities by utilizing the latest data science applications to solve some of the toughest challenges in the civic engagement space. The Senior Data Scientist will take a leading role in improving VPC/CVI’s data processing and analytics work, such as evaluating the quality of data sources and tools, applying statistical methods to generate actionable insights, and building machine learning models to improve program effectiveness. The Senior Data Scientist will work on a broad range of statistical, AI/ML, and business intelligence solutions to elevate the impact of VPC/CVI programs. An ideal candidate has deep passion for increasing voter participation among underrepresented constituencies, and is a collaborator who thrives in a team environment and takes ownership of the work. They will also actively contribute to improving processes, workflows, and communication. This position reports to the Senior Director of Data Science & Analytics.Primary ResponsibilitiesResponsibilities Include, but are not limited to: Draw actionable insights from past program and external data by formulating research questions, testing hypotheses, and determining solutions with statistical/ML toolsEvaluate the quality of alternative data sources, model scores, and matching algorithmsDesign, develop, test, deploy AI/ML models that improve program impact and cost-effectivenessTake ownership of the entire data science project lifecycleDevelop metrics on key program performance drivers and trends for standardized reportingProactively identify new data sources and analytics opportunitiesDevelop and maintain documentation for the analytics team’s workflow and codeHelp teammates troubleshoot their SQL and Python code and provide training on those skillsEffectively communicate results with teammates and external partners using data visualizations and presentations toolsSupport the adoption of industry best practices for data science and analyticsSkills and Qualifications The ideal candidate will have: Proficiency in:Statistical inferences (probabilities, hypothesis testing, effect estimate, power analysis, regressions, etc)Machine learning techniques (supervised and unsupervised learning, NLP, etc)Every stage of the data science lifecycle, including data mining, cleaning, exploration, feature engineering, modeling, evaluation, optimization, and visualizationPython or R and their corresponding ML libraries (Scikit-learn, XGBoost, PyTorch, etc) and visualization libraries (Seaborn, Plotly, etc)SQL for data querying and processingUNIX shell scripting (Bash/Zsh)Version control (Git and Github)Strong track record of bringing industry-standard predictive models to productionSolid understanding of distributed storage and big data computing frameworks (Cassandra, Hadoop, Spark)Solid understanding of cloud-based (AWS, Google Cloud, Azure, etc) computing resources and infrastructureExperience in applying advanced research methods and analyzing/interpreting complex research findingsExperience in analyzing household-level or person-level data sets including large numbers of featuresExtensive track record of writing clear code that is well-documentedDemonstrated ability to learn new techniques and troubleshoot code without support; work independently and be a self-starterDemonstrated ability to work effectively in teams, in both a lead and support roleDemonstrated ability to coach teammates to improve their skills and teach new skillsEffective time management skills, including demonstrated ability to manage and prioritize multiple tasks and projectsNice-To-Haves: Knowledge of randomized control trials, experimental design, and survey researchKnowledge of deep learning techniquesExperience in data mining using API calls, web scraping, etcExperience in building data pipelines and ETL workflowsExperience in object-oriented programmingFamiliarity with reporting and dashboarding tools such as Tableau and PeriscopeExperience in or knowledge of large scale voter registration and civic engagement programsThe salary range for this position is $90,000-$110,000. This is a full-time position. VPC and CVI offer an excellent benefits package, including 100% coverage of healthcare premiums.To apply, please submit a resume, cover letter, and three references. References are not contacted until you are notified.VPC/CVI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We strongly value the leadership of people of color, LGBTQ individuals, and other traditionally marginalized communities, and encourage diverse candidates to apply.*Job Type: Full-timePay: $90,000.00 - $110,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Location:One locationCompany's website:https://jobs.lever.co/voterparticipation/899c4938-01ce-4866-bed4-04535399e534Company's Facebook page:https://www.facebook.com/voterparticipationcenterBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyOnly full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19COVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processVirtual meetings",466,Washington
25,Senior Data Scientist,Weber Shandwick,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"Weber Shandwick is seeking a talented Senior Data Scientist to join our team in Washington, DC. You will be joining a team of business strategists, data scientists and data engineers to build large-scale innovative data solutions.

The Senior Data Scientist will design, build, test, and implement data solutions that support clients' Enterprise Analytics teams as well as Weber Shandwick's internal strategy, creative and media planning teams. The role will work closely with business strategists and data engineers to ensure the platform meets business demands.

Creative out-of-the-box thinker who will drive innovation.

Work with business strategists and client leads to obtain a greater understanding of the needs of the business and the types of solutions that supports business goals.

Design and build innovative data solutions, utilizing ML, NPL, deep learning and graph analytics.

Build data pipelines and Python-based ETL tools for acquiring, processing, and delivering data.

Deploy data solutions on cloud platforms, including data ingestion, processing, storage, analytics integration and front-end development, ensuring best practices, efficiency, scalability, low cost.

Lead projects and mentor junior team members.

Essential Qualifications:
Master's degree in statistics, computer science, math, engineering or related STEM degree

3+ years of experience as a data scientist, ML engineer or similar role

3+ years backend development experience with Python, R or equivalent

Experience with AWS or Google Cloud Platform (GCP strongly preferred)

Excellent written and spoken communication skills

Ability to lead projects independently and manage junior staff

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in marketing analytics, advertising, and ad tech

Experience working in a consultative setting

About Weber Shandwick

Weber Shandwick is a leading global communications and engagement firm in 80 cities across 34 countries, with a network extending to 128 cities in 81 countries. The firm's diverse team of strategists, analysts, producers, designers, developers and campaign activators has won the most prestigious awards in the world for innovative, creative approaches and impactful work. Weber Shandwick was the only public relations agency included on the Advertising Age Agency A-list in 2014 and 2015 and the only PR firm designated an A-List Agency Standout in 2017. Weber Shandwick was honored as PRWeek's Global Agency of the Year in 2015, 2016 and 2017, The Holmes Report's Global Agency of the Year in 2010, 2012, 2014, 2015 and 2017, and The Holmes Report's Global Digital Agency of the Year in 2016.

The firm deploys deep expertise across sectors and specialty areas, including consumer marketing, corporate reputation, healthcare, technology, public affairs, financial services, employee engagement, social impact, financial communications and crisis management, using proprietary social, digital and analytics methodologies. Weber Shandwick is part of the Interpublic Group (NYSE: IPG). For more information, visit http://www.webershandwick.com .

Weber Shandwick is proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Weber Shandwick recruits qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, gender, age, ethnic or national origin, protected veteran status, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status or citizenship status.

#LI-OD1
We make our careers website accessible to any and all users. If you need an accommodation to participate in the application process, please contact us at JobAppAccommodation@ipgdxtra.com . This email address is not for general employment inquiries or vendors; rather it is strictly for applicants who require special assistance accessing our employment website. Due to volume, messages sent to this email address that are not related to an accommodation cannot be answered.",466,Washington
26,Senior Data Scientist,"Novavax, Inc.","Gaithersburg, MD 20878",None,"If you find science, speed, and success exhilarating, you have come to the right place.
Novavax, Inc. (Nasdaq: NVAX) is a biotechnology company that promotes improved health globally through the discovery, development, and commercialization of innovative vaccines to prevent serious infectious diseases. Novavax is currently conducting multiple late-stage clinical trials for NVX-CoV2373, our vaccine candidate against the virus that causes COVID-19, and has recently reported exciting and highly encouraging initial efficacy results. NanoFlu, our quadrivalent influenza nanoparticle vaccine, met all primary objectives in its pivotal Phase 3 clinical trial in older adults. Both candidate vaccines incorporate Novavax' proprietary saponin-based Matrix-M adjuvant to enhance the immune response and stimulate high levels of neutralizing antibodies. Novavax is a leading innovator of recombinant vaccines. Our proprietary technology platform leverages the power and speed of genetic engineering to efficiently produce highly immunogenic nanoparticles in order to address urgent global health needs.
Novavax, Inc. is headquartered in Gaithersburg, Maryland with additional facilities in Uppsala, Sweden and Bohumil, Czech Republic.
We are seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our Data Science and Statistics team. This position will be responsible for positioning data science as a key competency within the company. You will be creating value from data assets using advanced analytics capabilities including data science, machine learning, and artificial intelligence methodologies to identify critical business risk and opportunities.
Responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Identify high-impact data science use cases, develop, and implement innovative solutions to drive business impact and develop state-of-the-art analytical capabilities to address identified needs.
Evaluate, drive and implement solutions from concept to minimum viable product and final product
Apply analytical and statistical methods to solve identified use cases in an agile manner using multiple data sources and analytical tools
Collaborate within cross-functional teams to develop solutions, gain alignment and deliver impactful business insights; engage necessary stakeholders to enable better decision-making
Interpret and communicate analytics results clearly and concisely to audiences with varying backgrounds and degrees of technical understanding
Take an enterprise mindset, linking individual responsibilities with the broader organization; focus on outcomes that provide most business value
Partner with data science experts from the outside community to share best-in-class solutions and drive collaborative approaches towards data science challenges
Minimum requirements:
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Bioinformatics, Mathematics or equivalent field
At least 5 years of commercial/industry experience, working in a hands-on capacity as a Data Scientist
An overall understanding of the key challenges in our industry
Experience in the areas of analytics, data transformation, and data science
Passion and proactiveness for applying state-of-the-art analytical methods to find solutions to complex business problems.
Ability to work independently, prioritize within an interdisciplinary environment that includes (data) scientists, analysts, business stakeholders and consultants
Excellent communication and effective problem-solving skills; track record in serving a variety of diverse customers and projects
Willingness to guide and inspire business stakeholders, data scientists and other colleagues along the journey into the world of data science.
Ability to apply scientific principles in a broad range of technical assignments, making independent decisions based on sound scientific reasoning and analysis
Demonstrated leadership as applied to the management of complex technical projects
Experience with Agile development methods including Scrum and Kanban preferred
Excellent communication and effective problem-solving skills; track record in serving a variety of diverse customers and projects
Experience with Statistics, Data Mining, Machine Learning, Data Visualization, Cloud Computing
Novavax is headquartered in Gaithersburg, Maryland with additional facilities in Uppsala, Sweden and Bohumil, Czech Republic. Novavax is traded on the Nasdaq Stock Market under the symbol NVAX and is dedicated to developing novel vaccines to address infectious disease.
Novavax offers a base salary, annual bonus, equity grants, professional career development/growth opportunities, and a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, vision, Rx, STD, LTD, Life, Optional Life, 401(k) plan.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Novavax is an equal employment opportunity employer. Employment and advancement opportunities are available to all individuals on an at-will basis, regardless of their race, color, national origin, religion, ancestry, citizenship status, military or veteran status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, disability, genetic information, protective hairstyle, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.
#LI-JF1",466,Washington
27,Senior Data Analyst,Leidos,"Reston, VA 20170","$78,000 - $120,000 a year","Description
Job Description:
Job Description
NGEN is the largest IT services program for the Navy. Under the Service Management, Integration, and Transport (SMIT) portion of NGEN, the Leidos team will deliver the core backbone of the Navy-Marine Corps Intranet, including cybersecurity services, network operations, service desk, and data transport. Ultimately, Leidos will support the Navy in unifying its shore-based networks and data management to improve capability and service while also saving significant dollars by focusing efforts under one enterprise network.
At Leidos, we know the most talented and diverse IT and Engineering professionals will always have a multitude of career choices; your time at Leidos will be a wise investment in your career and in yourself.
Job Summary:
Leidos is seeking a Senior-level Data Analyst to support End User delivery as one of the key members of the Seat Services team. The candidate will be responsible for collecting and analyzing key data points for successful End User device delivery.
Primary Responsibilities
Developing customer reports
Provide data analyst team oversight
Data analysis using Microsoft Excel
Scheduling and reporting
Supporting Project Management team
Collecting and processing customer data
Direct employees in end user device production environment
Work with subcontractor vendors to meet demand requirements
Resolve escalated employee and operational issues
Manage customer schedules
Interact with end user device vendor to ensure SLRs are met
Manages small team consisting of experienced Data Analysts
Lead, direct and review the work of team
Provide primary input to hiring, firing, promotion, performance and rewards decisions for direct reports
Basic Qualifications
US Citizen
DoD Secret Clearance
High school diploma and 10 years of prior related work experience
Must demonstrated expertise in Microsoft Excel
Excellent customer service skills
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Preferred Qualifications
Organized and detail-oriented
Self-motivated/ self-directing
Strong collaboration, prioritization, and adaptability skills required
Ability to manage and prioritize own work
Independent decision making
Analytical thinking; thinking out of the box
Ability to effectively communicate with all organizational levels (SME to Senior Management)
External Referral Bonus:
Ineligible
Potential for Telework:
Yes, 50%
Clearance Level Required:
Secret
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Manager
Job Family:
Network Administration and Ops
Pay Range:
Pay Range $78,000.00 - $120,000.00 - $162,000.00",466,Washington
28,Senior Statistician,Franklin IQ,"Arlington, VA 22205 (Dominion Hills area)",$70 - $100 an hour,"StatisticianAbout Franklin IQ: Franklin IQ is a management consulting firm that provides organizational leaders with human capital consulting, professional development training and design, group facilitation and certified coaching using data-driven, and quantifiably measurable approaches. We team with our stakeholders to align strategy, empower talent and optimize organizations to meet the demands of a 21st-century talent landscape.The Opportunity: Franklin IQ is looking for a Statistician to join our team. This role requires a collaborative spirit, attention to detail, experience in applied mathematical theory and statistical model development. Our ideal new teammate has is an expert at data interpretation, process improvement and data collection. The candidate must be located in the DC Metro area.Other tasks include (but are not limited to): · Develops supportive materials for recommendations and conclusions through data-based models· Determines best data to utilize to drive decision-making· Applies mathematical theory and techniques· Develops the process for data aggregation· Analyzes data and provides recommendationsMinimum Requirements: · PhD in a related field of study.· 6+ years’ experience in supporting complex business initiatives· 3+ academic publications in recent years· 5+ years working with federal clients (preferred)How to Apply: Submit your resume on Indeed with brief statement of interest.Job Types: Part-time, Contract, TemporaryPay: $70.00 - $100.00 per hourApplication Question(s):Do you have 3+ academic publications in the last few years?Education:Doctorate (Required)Experience:complex business initiatives: 6 years (Required)Python: 3 years (Required)Federal client: 5 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Yes",466,Washington
29,Junior OR Mid OR Senior Data Scientist,EpochGeo,"Washington, DC","$100,000 - $200,000 a year","Mid - Senior Geospatial Data Scientist / AnalystEpochGeo is looking for a junior to senior level Data Scientist to support one of the most exciting, and technically challenging, data rich projects in the national security space.Are you a data scientist, economist, mathematician, technical geographer, or similar, who loves to work with data, find patterns in it, and then turn it into actionable intelligence? Are you a data scientist who loves to draw out insights from data, and then work collaboratively with analysts and engineers to turn those insights into automated workflows? If so, please reach out to us at EpochGeo to chat.Big data problems can be overwhelming, inaccessible, and noisy. EpochGeo is a data services firm specializing in supporting the full spectrum data cycle: beginning with scalable data storage and ending in producing impactful analytics. Our developers, analysts, and data scientists have a proven track record applying open-source innovative technology, data science, and actionable analytics to inform customers’ data driven decisions.Your background likely includes: 1 - 5+ years of experience of data engineering, coding in python, SQL, and familiarity with Keras, Tensorflow, or PyTorch frameworks preferred.Education or experience in Data Science, Economics, Computer Science, or GeographyProven history of applying machine learning and statistical methods to complex problem sets that resulted in successful outcomes.Experience querying and integrating data flows from an Elasticsearch instance as well as presenting and retrieving data via Kibana.A bonus to have military and/or DoD/IC experience in any of the following disciplines: data science, computer vision, target development, geospatial, or statistical analysis.What you will be doing: Exploiting multiple big data environments for insights that can be automated at scale with developer assistance.Working in a dynamic environment to identify customer opportunities to apply machine learning algorithms.Creating and fine tuning machine learning hyperparameters or utilizing AutoML solutions to optimize machine learning algorithms to solve customer problem sets.Preparing data visualization products from your analysis that turn into finished intelligence products and reports.Bonus: Master’s degree in Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Economics, Geography, or a similar fieldAdditional: Must hold a TS clearanceJob Type: Full-timePay: $100,000.00 - $200,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programRelocation assistanceTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftSupplemental Pay:Bonus payEducation:High school or equivalent (Required)Experience:Data science: 1 year (Required)Python: 1 year (Preferred)Security Clearance:Top Secret (Required)Work Location:Multiple locationsWork Remotely:No",466,Washington
30,Senior Data Analyst,Deloitte,"Alexandria, VA 22314 (King St. Metro-Eisenhower Ave. area)",None,"Do you want to build your brand by working for a leading consulting firm that drives eminence in the marketplace? Are you interested in leveraging your analytical skills and strategic ideas to improve mission execution? If so, Deloitte could be the place for you! Our Government Public Services Strategy and Analytics team brings deep industry expertise, rigorous analytical capabilities and a pragmatic mindset to help solve our client's most complex business problems. Join our team and play a key role in helping to design our clients' roadmap to the future and help transform the GPS marketplace.
Work you'll do
The Data Analyst will join a team and will be responsible for developing analytics products; applying data visualization and statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable key mission outcomes. This person will be responsible for triaging incoming regulatory submissions to the client and perform data analysis and data curation activities.
Travel up to 10% (While 10% of travel is a requirement of the role, due to COVID-19, non-essential travel has been suspended until further notice.)
The team
Analytics & Cognitive
In this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the future with confidence, embracing decision making with clear, data-driven choices that deliver enterprise value in a dynamic business environment.
The Analytics & Cognitive team leverages the power of data, analytics, robotics, science and cognitive technologies to uncover hidden relationships from vast troves of data, generate insights, and inform decision-making. Together with the Strategy practice, our Strategy & Analytics portfolio helps clients transform their business by architecting organizational intelligence programs and differentiated strategies to win in their chosen markets.
Analytics & Cognitive will work with our clients to:
Implement large-scale data ecosystems including data management, governance and the integration of structured and unstructured data to generate insights leveraging cloud-based platforms
Leverage automation, cognitive and science-based techniques to manage data, predict scenarios and prescribe actions
Drive operational efficiency by maintaining their data ecosystems, sourcing analytics expertise and providing As-a-Service offerings for continuous insights and improvements
Qualifications

5+ relevant experience within data analysis, business intelligence, or dashboard development
Experience with database management
Strong strategic communication skills to include presenting quantitative concepts in easy to understand formats and actively listening to identify business problems and their causes
High-performing team player who believes that cross-functional teams are greater than the sum of its parts
Must be able to obtain/maintain the required security clearance
Preferred:
2+ years of relevant consulting or industry experience
Familiarity with SQL
How you'll grow
At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there's always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world.
Benefits
At Deloitte, we know that great people make a great organization. We value our people and offer employees a broad range of benefits. Learn more about what working at Deloitte can mean for you.
Deloitte's culture
Our positive and supportive culture encourages our people to do their best work every day. We celebrate individuals by recognizing their uniqueness and offering them the flexibility to make daily choices that can help them to be healthy, centered, confident, and aware. We offer well-being programs and are continuously looking for new ways to maintain a culture where our people excel and lead healthy, happy lives. Learn more about Life at Deloitte.
Corporate citizenship
Deloitte is led by a purpose: to make an impact that matters. This purpose defines who we are and extends to relationships with our clients, our people and our communities. We believe that business has the power to inspire and transform. We focus on education, giving, skill-based volunteerism, and leadership to help drive positive social impact in our communities. Learn more about Deloitte's impact on the world.
Recruiter tips
We want job seekers exploring opportunities at Deloitte to feel prepared and confident. To help you with your interview, we suggest that you do your research: know some background about the organization and the business area you're applying to. Check out recruiting tips from Deloitte professionals.",466,Washington
31,Senior Execution Data Scientist,DataRobot,"Washington, DC",None,"About DataRobot

DataRobot is the leader in enterprise AI, delivering trusted AI technology and enablement services to global enterprises competing in today's Intelligence Revolution. DataRobot's enterprise AI platform democratizes data science with end-to-end automation for building, deploying, and managing machine learning models. This platform maximizes business value by delivering AI at scale and continuously optimizing performance over time. The company's proven combination of cutting-edge software and world-class AI implementation, training, and support services empower any organization – regardless of size, industry, or resources – to drive better business outcomes with AI. With a singular focus on AI since its inception, DataRobot has a proven track record of delivering AI with ROI. DataRobot has offices across the globe and more than $700 million in funding from top-tier firms, including Altimeter, New Enterprise Associates, Sapphire Ventures, Meritech, and DFJ Growth. For more information, visit https://www.datarobot.com , and join the conversation on Twitter and LinkedIn.

About the Role

As a Senior Execution Data Scientist on DataRobot's Public Sector team, you will work on various real-world problems across government agencies. You will implement the entire machine learning lifecycle, from data preparation, model building, model deployment, model management, and output consumption. You will also be responsible for investigating customer datasets, identifying data quality issues and creating reports to surface problems and opportunities to solve the Federal government's toughest problems. As a member of the Federal team, you will work with various agencies to help improve data-driven decision making. You will provide data science knowledge and expertise as a trusted advisor to the client.

Ideal candidates enjoy day-to-day data science problem-solving mixed with high levels of customer interaction.

Main Requirements

8 + years of real-world business experience with data science projects
Hands-on experience building and implementing predictive models
Experience with machine learning techniques
Strong understanding of applied statistics and data mining/munging techniques
Excellent organizational, communication, writing and interpersonal skills
Fluency with Python

Desired Skills

Consulting experience
Familiarity with Spark and related Big Data technologies
Familiarity with a variety of technical tools for the manipulation and analysis of datasets
Familiarity with SQL
Data visualization
Experience with government or not-for-profit organizations",466,Washington
32,"Resilience Analytics and Data Visualization Specialist, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Arlington, VA",None,"The Challenge:
Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set? Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by the IoT, machine learning, and artificial intelligence advances? In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities. As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges.
We have an opportunity for you to use your leadership and analytical skills to reduce the impacts of natural disasters on people, infrastructure, and the economy. You will explore and operationalize multifaceted data sets using scientific processes and technologies to uncover and communicate insights. You'll identify, acquire, ingest, and query structured and unstructured data, including geospatial data. You'll develop quantitative analyses, predictive models, and visualizations to drive critical client decisions. Join us as we use data science for good to improve the nation's resilience to disasters.
Empower change with us.
You Have:
5+ years of experience with performing data analytics and visualization tasks in a professional work environment
Experience with scripting languages, including Python, JavaScript, or R
Experience with data visualization and dashboarding tools, including Tableau or Power BI
Knowledge of geographic information systems (GIS) and geospatial analysis
Knowledge of data sets for natural hazards and disaster management
Knowledge of disaster resilience issues
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:
Experience with statistical modeling, including probabilistic modeling approaches
Experience with advanced techniques, including machine learning and natural language processing
MA or MS degree
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
Build Your Career:
At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics and we’re dedicated to helping you grow as a data analysis professional. When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the chance to:
access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Hortonworks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
participate in partnerships with data science leaders, like our partnership with NVIDIA to deliver Deep Learning Institute (DLI) training to the federal government
You’ll have access to a wealth of training resources through our Analytics University, an online learning portal specifically geared towards data science and analytics skills, where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and state-of-the-art tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, on-site bootcamps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.
#LI-AH1",466,Washington
33,"Cybersecurity Data Scientist, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Herndon, VA",None,"The Challenge:
Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set? Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by Cybersecurity threat hunting, analytics and detection for Enterprise-scale environments and Cloud using analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence? In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities. As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges.
You’ll work closely with your customer data to understand their environments to find the pieces of their information puzzle. You’ll develop algorithms, write scripts, build predictive analytics, use automation, apply machine learning, and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help senior leadership make informed decisions. You'll engineer AI/ML Ops capabilities for Cloud-scale data analytics.
Empower change with us.
You Have:
3+ years of experience with data science, data analytics, or software engineering for data solutions
3+ years of experience with cybersecurity data, including logs, events, or SIEMs
Experience with Python, java, R, or SQL
Experience with big data analytics, machine learning, artificial intelligence, anomaly detection
Experience with penetration testing, malware analysis, threat hunting, or red/blue teams
Experience with analytics applied for Cybersecurity use cases
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS Degree
Nice If You Have:
Experience with Jupyter Hub or Notebooks
Experience with programming languages, including Java, C#, or SQL
Experience with Cloud services, including AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with data presentation and visualization
Experience with analytics libraries or frameworks, including numpy, pandas, scikit)
MA or MS degree; PhD degree preferred
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
Build Your Career:
 At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics and we’re dedicated to helping you grow as a data analysis professional. When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the chance to:
access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Hortonworks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
participate in partnerships with data science leaders, like our partnership with NVIDIA to deliver Deep Learning Institute (DLI) training to the federal government
You’ll have access to a wealth of training resources through our Analytics University, an online learning portal specifically geared towards data science and analytics skills, where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and state-of-the-art tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, on-site bootcamps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",466,Washington
34,Senior Data Analyst,Code42,"Reston, VA 20191",None,"In the race for ideas, we never want our customers to compromise the speed of innovation nor the safety of their data. Code42 provides protection from Insider Threat by delivering a fast, simple path to data loss detection, investigation and response. With our product, security teams easily protect corporate data and reduce insider risk while fostering an open and collaborative culture for employees. We are proud our insider threat solution has been honored with a number of national awards. This includes Globee, IT World, Black Unicorn and Stevie Awards, as well as Cyber Defense Magazine InfoSec Awards, Cybersecurity Excellence Awards and an Info Security PG’s Global Excellence Award.
You belong at Code42 if you crave being a part of a transparent and collaborative culture, you want to drive innovation, and security is always top of mind. We look for authentic people who are inquisitive, enjoy solving complex problems, think creatively and provide diverse insights to help us think differently and thrive together. Don’t wait. #BeCode42.
YOU’LL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR:
Working closely with product managers, engineers, and data scientists on the Incydr product to identifying important questions and answer them with data
Providing expertise and translate the product needs to design; and developing tools, techniques, and metrics, and dashboards for insights
Working with product teams to identify key metrics for measuring product adoption and usage
Identifying opportunities for improving the fidelity of insider risk signals
Performing varied analytical tasks using data sources such as Redshift and ElasticSearch
Working with large, sensitive data sets on problems that matter to our team and our customers
Developing analyses, reports, and dashboards using reproducible methods
Collaborating with data engineers to improve and expand ETL processes
SKILLS AND REQUIREMENTS:
5+ years’ experience performing quantitative analysis, preferably for a technology company
Proficiency manipulating, transforming, and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data in relational databases with SQL
Strong experience programming with R or Python for data analysis
Expertise building reproducible reports and dashboards with your toolset (Rmarkdown, Shiny, Dash, etc.)
Experience with ElasticSearch, Kibana, and/or AWS services a plus
Proven ability to work in a fast-paced environment, and to meet changing deadlines and priorities on multiple simultaneous projects
Excellent organizational, communication and interpersonal skills
Enjoy working in both individual and team settings
WHY #BECODE42:
A first-class onboarding experience which includes professional development, personal development all while learning and living our Code42 values. We provide comprehensive benefits that include health, dental, vision, wellness, 401k, maternity/paternity leave, generous paid time off and volunteer opportunities. At Code42 everyone is an owner. We participate in a commission or bonus plans and all receive stock options. We win together.",466,Washington
35,"Senior Associate, Data Scientist - Valuations Team",Capital One - US,"McLean, VA",None,"Center 1 (19052), United States of America, McLean, Virginia
Senior Associate, Data Scientist - Valuations Team
Data is at the center of everything we do. As a startup, we disrupted the credit card industry by individually personalizing every credit card offer using statistical modeling and the relational database, cutting edge technology in 1988! Fast-forward a few years, and this little innovation and our passion for data has skyrocketed us to a Fortune 200 company and a leader in the world of data-driven decision-making.
As a Data Scientist at Capital One, you’ll be part of a team that’s leading the next wave of disruption at a whole new scale, using the latest in computing and machine learning technologies and operating across billions of customer records to unlock the big opportunities that help everyday people save money, time and agony in their financial lives.
Team Description
As a Data Scientist at Capital One, you’ll be part of the Valuations team for our Branded Card Customer Acquisition group, assisting our vertical lines of business in critical analytical decision making. In this role, you will apply your modeling expertise and software engineering skills to design, build, deploy and monitor our valuation models.
Role Description
In this role, you will:
Partner with a cross-functional team of data scientists, software engineers, and business analysts to deliver a product customers love
Leverage a broad stack of technologies — Python, Conda, AWS, H2O, Spark, Docker and more — to reveal the insights hidden within huge volumes of numeric and textual data
Build machine learning models through all phases of development, from design through training, evaluation, validation, and implementation
Flex your interpersonal skills to translate the complexity of your work into tangible business goals
The Ideal Candidate is:
Creative. You thrive on bringing definition to big, undefined problems. You love asking questions and pushing hard to find answers. You’re not afraid to share a new idea.
Statistically-minded. You’ve built models, validated them, and back tested them. You know how to interpret a confusion matrix or a ROC curve. You have experience with clustering, classification, survival modeling, time series, and deep learning.
Technical. You’re comfortable with open-source languages and are passionate about developing further. You have hands-on experience developing data science solutions using open-source tools and cloud computing platforms.
A data guru. “Big data” doesn’t phase you. You have the skills to retrieve, combine, and analyze data from a variety of sources and structures. You know understanding the data is often the key to great data science.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree plus 2 years of experience in data analytics, or Master’s Degree, or PhD
At least 1 year of experience in open source programming languages for large scale data analysis
At least 1 year of experience with machine learning
At least 1 year of experience with relational databases
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s Degree in “STEM” field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics), or PhD in “STEM” field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics)
Experience working with AWS
At least 2 years’ experience in Python, Scala, or R
At least 2 years’ experience with machine learning
At least 2 years’ experience with SQL
Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",466,Washington
36,"Senior Statistician, Early Oncology",AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD 20878",None,"Do you have expertise in, and passion for, Biometrics? Would you like to apply your expertise to impact Early Oncology in a company that follows the science and turns ideas into life changing medicines? Then AstraZeneca might be the one for you!
AstraZeneca is a global, science-led, patient-focused biopharmaceutical company that focuses on the discovery, development and commercialization of prescription medicines for some of the world’s most serious diseases. But we’re more than one of the world’s leading pharmaceutical companies.
Our Early Oncology statistics team is totally focused on delivering innovation, science and seeking out opportunity. This dynamic team is looking for passionate, innovative individuals to help develop, lead and shape the way we work. We are committed to supporting personal development and growth of individuals.
We have achieved a lot in a short space of time by focusing on our pipeline and evaluating novelty and clinical development movement. In 2019 and 2020 we were ranked at the top of the invention scale with “best pipeline” by ‘IDEA Pharma’. But the next chapter of our pipeline is more exciting than ever… We have an ambitious goal to deliver 6 new molecular entities by 2025.
We are currently looking for an experienced Senior Statistician to work at the heart of our clinical project teams. Your proven statistical expertise will be a key influence on our clinical program designs, informing our decision making and driving best practice.

Main responsibilities:
Conduct statistical thinking and contributions to clinical development plans
Through collaboration with experts, develop design options and provide quantitative decision support
Innovate and improve study design through adaptive design and Bayesian methods, including trial simulation
Improve statistical methodology, processes and delivery activities
Interpret and present clinical trial results.
Essential requirements:
Statistics or Mathematics related MSc degree.
Direct experience of clinical trials, ideally in pharmaceuticals or healthcare
Excellent interpersonal skills
A collaborative mindset
Genuine commitment to drive innovation to advance statistical science
Preferred:
Ph.D. Statistics or Mathematics with Statistical component
Oncology experience preferred
Why AstraZeneca?
At AstraZeneca we’re dedicated to being a Great Place to Work. Where you are empowered to push the boundaries of science and unleash your entrepreneurial spirit. There’s no better place to make a difference to medicine, patients and society. An inclusive culture that champions diversity and collaboration, and always committed to lifelong learning, growth and development. We’re on an exciting journey to pioneer the future of healthcare.
So, what’s next?
Are you already imagining yourself joining our team? Good, because we can’t wait to hear from you.
Where can I find out more?
Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/
Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/
Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en",466,Washington
37,Senior Data Scientist,Donya Consulting Group,"Arlington, VA 22202 (Aurora Highlands area)","$165,000 - $192,000 a year","CLEARANCE LEVEL REQUIRED: TOP SECRETExperience: 8 years with Intelligence Community experience 2 yrsThe successful Sr Data Scientist in Defense Intelligence will support the Office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Intelligence and Security – OUSD(I&S). The effort will include the modernization, alignment and integration of Combatant Command Intelligence capabilities and the rest of the Defense Intelligence Enterprise. As a member of enterprise team, you will work with analysts, engineers, and other scientists using innovative techniques and tools to drive decision making. The successful Data Scientist will employ analytical methods or platforms to communicate predictions, findings, or risks through effective data visualizations and reports in support of the Combatant Commands. Producing applied data science techniques in the intelligence field, our Data Scientist will be impacting real time decision making.Essential Job ResponsibilitiesExtract data from a variety of sources (databases, web, text files) and in a variety of formats (structured, unstructured, JSON, etc.) and prepare the data for analysisDescribe data using qualitative and quantitative aggregation/summarization and build tools (static reports, interactive dashboards, web applications) that allow clients to easily view and understand important patterns and trends in the dataProvide quantitative comparisons of data points using advanced statistical analysis including data reduction techniques, resampling, as well as traditional statistical hypothesis testingConstruct and validate predictive models using a variety of techniquesPrepare analytic products in written, oral, visual, and/or multimedia formats.Devise open-source research and collection management practices.Facilitate and manage intelligence processes and practices.Preferred RequirementsText Analytics - IN-SPIRE, Jigsaw, RData Analytics – Excel, Power BI, TableauDocument Development - Word, MS Publisher, Adobe suiteVisual Analytics – Kibana, Virtualitics, GraphikaVisualization - Gephi, Word cloud, R or JavaGraphics Production - PowerPoint, Adobe Creative Suite, Photoshop, HTML5Programming – Python, SQL, API DevelopmentDatabase – Database Modeling, Database Management, Database TypesData Ingestion – ETL/ELT, NIFI, KAFKA, ESBJob Type: Full-timePay: $165,000.00 - $192,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus paySigning bonusEducation:Master's (Preferred)Experience:Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)Python: 1 year (Preferred)Security Clearance:Top Secret (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",466,Washington
38,Senior Data Analyst,Center For Policing Equity,"Washington, DC",None,"LocationWashington DC; remote for the right candidatePosition DescriptionThe Center for Policing Equity (CPE) is looking for a highly-skilled Senior Data Analyst with at least 3 years of experience in the collection and evaluation of data. The Senior Data Analyst will be responsible for performing analysis and reporting functions for the evaluation of CPE's signature interventions using publicly available data, staff collected data, programmatic data, and data from our law enforcement partners. In addition, the Senior Data Analyst will be responsible for continuously iterating on streamlining evaluation processes, data analysis, and deliverables.This position will report to the Sr. Intervention Scientist and works in a collaborative effort with the Product Discovery Team.Key ResponsibilitiesUse qualitative and quantitative data to answer evaluation questions related to the implementation and outcomes of signature interventions (Compstat for Justice, Justice Navigator)Perform data pre-processing/wrangling tasks to prepare the data for analysisCo-develop evaluation research questions and analytic methodsTrack achievement on short/intermediate/long-term outcomes of interventionsTranslate findings into recommendations and strategy for a variety of audiencesLead continual process improvement for data analysisContribute to creation of high-quality materials for internal teams, CPE leadership, and stakeholders (i.e., reports, PowerPoint presentations, white papers)Qualifications (required)Bachelor's degree and 3+ years of relevant professional experiencePossess end-to-end data expertise including data sourcing, merging, cleaning, restructuring/wrangling, and visualizationHighly proficient statistical programming in R or similar platforms to conduct descriptive statistics, correlations, multivariate regressions, hierarchical modeling, time series analysis, etc.Expert capability to explain analytical findings in clear terms that can be understood by non-technical audiencesExperience producing interactive data visualizations to communicate findings (i.e. Tableau, PowerBI, Google DataStudio, etc.)Ability to collaborate effectively with a diverse team of scientists, analysts, field staff, and data engineers across the organizationAbility to function effectively both independently and as part of a geographically distributed teamFamiliarity with relational databases and the ability to construct complex queries using SQLA keen attention to detail and a profound appreciation for and commitment to using data to tell a compelling story via data visualizationsQualifications (preferred)Master's degree preferred with a specialization in Statistics, Data Science, Health Services Research, Social Science disciplines or a related fieldPrior experience with and knowledge of statistics, demography, mathematics, data science, epidemiology, or other quantitative fieldExperience working with large publicly available datasets on public health, economics, health outcomes, and community-level indicators of wellness and equityExperience and interest working with diverse analytic methodologies (e.g., longitudinal data analysis, multilevel modeling, difference-in-difference, econometrics, grounded theory)Ability to produce markdown notebooks with Jupyter, RStudio, or similar platformQualitative evaluation experience with an emphasis on NVivo or a related qualitative software (i.e. reviewing and coding)Mixed-methods experience and/or experience analyzing qualitative data from surveys, interviews, and focus groupsExperience analyzing large distributed datasets using technologies like Hadoop and/or SparkApplication Submission GuidelinesApplications will be considered on a rolling basis. To apply, please submit the following materials:CV/resumeCover LetterTwo writing samples (peer-reviewed journal article, technical reports, white paper, data visualization product, etc.)Job Type: Full-time",466,Washington
39,Senior Oracle DBA - Data Scientist,Alpha Omega Integration,"Washington, DC 20520 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"Alpha Omega Integration, LLC., a Virginia Business Best Places to work for 2012-2019, along with recognition such as the Virginia Chamber of Commerce Fantastic 50, Inc. 5000 #143, Washington Technology Fast 50 #11, and the Vanguard Top Service Company Award is actively seeking passionate leaders to join our team, support our nation’s government agencies, and make a difference!
Why Us?
We foster a culture that values hard work and integrity. We are constantly awarding those who are self-starters, trustworthy, and have a good work ethic. If you like working with the latest in IT solutions and are looking to join an organization that is consistently voted one of the best in which to work, then check out your next career opportunity below!
We are actively seeking team members who enjoy meeting challenges with a smile. We offer a fast-paced, growing environment that takes care of the overall development of our employees. AOI has an exciting opportunity for you to be part of a team where you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Title: Senior Oracle DBA / Data Scientist, Washington, DC
Clearance Required: SECRET
The senior oracle DBA defines, designs, and/or develops relational and/or multi-dimensional databases for warehousing of data. As the senior data architect for the organization, he/she will review current data structures and recommend optimizations and reconfigurations as warranted.
Responsibilities:
Daily maintenance including monitoring and database maintenance tasks
Install and Build database structures
Develop and maintain shell scripts
Query and performance tuning
Develop and maintain documentation
Program in PL/SQL
Performance tuning of databases
Reviews database design and make recommendations regarding enhancements and/or improvements
Maintains security and integrity controls
Develop stored procedures and/or triggers
Install database server software
Design and build databases, schemas, stored procedures, and other database objects
Set up routine database backup procedures
Perform database recoveries
Tune databases for performance. Monitor database performance trends
Assist developers and end-users with database usage, query development, and tuning
Develop operating system scripts to automate backups, data transfers, monitoring, etc.
Install and support the database components of packaged database applications
Support database connectivity from client applications
Export and import of database objects using Data pump utilities EXPDP and IMPDP
Advanced Data Modeling
Data Warehouse expertise
Required Skills:
Proficient in PL/SQL
Database developers who have knowledge of administration.
Hands on experience with Oracle Database and MS SQL
Experience in Data migration and recovery
Prior experience or ability work effectively with virtual teams
Min 10 years working as an Oracle DBA
Min 2 years experience with MS SQL Server
3-5 years with Unix/Solaris/Windows
5-7 years' experience in DBA tasks such as configuring backups, restoring DB from backups, troubleshooting DB issues, applying patches, data load operations
5-7 years' experience with SQL programming
5-7 years’ experience with Data Warehouses
5-7 years’ experience with Business Intelligence
Experienced in migrating Databases from Oracle to SQL Server
Desired Skills:
Experience in using Migration tools such as SSMA
Knowledge in Azure Cloud and Azure SQL
Knowledge of Agile environment
Certifications of Oracle or Microsoft
Required Education:
Education Requirement with specific field of study: Masters of Information Systems Management, Associates in Computer Science, B.S. in science, health or related engineering field
Alpha Omega Integration, LLC (AOI) is committed to the development of a creative, diverse and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at AOI will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. AOI does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, IWDs, Veteran Status or any other characteristic protected by law (referred to as ""protected status.”",466,Washington
40,Senior Data Analyst,Leidos,"Reston, VA 20170","$78,000 - $120,000 a year","Description
Job Description:
Job Description
NGEN is the largest IT services program for the Navy. Under the Service Management, Integration, and Transport (SMIT) portion of NGEN, the Leidos team will deliver the core backbone of the Navy-Marine Corps Intranet, including cybersecurity services, network operations, service desk, and data transport. Ultimately, Leidos will support the Navy in unifying its shore-based networks and data management to improve capability and service while also saving significant dollars by focusing efforts under one enterprise network.
At Leidos, we know the most talented and diverse IT and Engineering professionals will always have a multitude of career choices; your time at Leidos will be a wise investment in your career and in yourself.
Job Summary:
Leidos is seeking a Senior-level Data Analyst to support End User delivery as one of the key members of the Seat Services team. The candidate will be responsible for collecting and analyzing key data points for successful End User device delivery.
Primary Responsibilities
Developing customer reports
Provide data analyst team oversight
Data analysis using Microsoft Excel
Scheduling and reporting
Supporting Project Management team
Collecting and processing customer data
Direct employees in end user device production environment
Work with subcontractor vendors to meet demand requirements
Resolve escalated employee and operational issues
Manage customer schedules
Interact with end user device vendor to ensure SLRs are met
Manages small team consisting of experienced Data Analysts
Lead, direct and review the work of team
Provide primary input to hiring, firing, promotion, performance and rewards decisions for direct reports
Basic Qualifications
US Citizen
DoD Secret Clearance
High school diploma and 10 years of prior related work experience
Must demonstrated expertise in Microsoft Excel
Excellent customer service skills
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Preferred Qualifications
Organized and detail-oriented
Self-motivated/ self-directing
Strong collaboration, prioritization, and adaptability skills required
Ability to manage and prioritize own work
Independent decision making
Analytical thinking; thinking out of the box
Ability to effectively communicate with all organizational levels (SME to Senior Management)
External Referral Bonus:
Ineligible
Potential for Telework:
Yes, 50%
Clearance Level Required:
Secret
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Manager
Job Family:
Network Administration and Ops
Pay Range:
Pay Range $78,000.00 - $120,000.00 - $162,000.00",466,Washington
41,Senior Statistician,Franklin IQ,"Arlington, VA 22205 (Dominion Hills area)",$70 - $100 an hour,"StatisticianAbout Franklin IQ: Franklin IQ is a management consulting firm that provides organizational leaders with human capital consulting, professional development training and design, group facilitation and certified coaching using data-driven, and quantifiably measurable approaches. We team with our stakeholders to align strategy, empower talent and optimize organizations to meet the demands of a 21st-century talent landscape.The Opportunity: Franklin IQ is looking for a Statistician to join our team. This role requires a collaborative spirit, attention to detail, experience in applied mathematical theory and statistical model development. Our ideal new teammate has is an expert at data interpretation, process improvement and data collection. The candidate must be located in the DC Metro area.Other tasks include (but are not limited to): · Develops supportive materials for recommendations and conclusions through data-based models· Determines best data to utilize to drive decision-making· Applies mathematical theory and techniques· Develops the process for data aggregation· Analyzes data and provides recommendationsMinimum Requirements: · PhD in a related field of study.· 6+ years’ experience in supporting complex business initiatives· 3+ academic publications in recent years· 5+ years working with federal clients (preferred)How to Apply: Submit your resume on Indeed with brief statement of interest.Job Types: Part-time, Contract, TemporaryPay: $70.00 - $100.00 per hourApplication Question(s):Do you have 3+ academic publications in the last few years?Education:Doctorate (Required)Experience:complex business initiatives: 6 years (Required)Python: 3 years (Required)Federal client: 5 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Yes",466,Washington
42,Junior OR Mid OR Senior Data Scientist,EpochGeo,"Washington, DC","$100,000 - $200,000 a year","Mid - Senior Geospatial Data Scientist / AnalystEpochGeo is looking for a junior to senior level Data Scientist to support one of the most exciting, and technically challenging, data rich projects in the national security space.Are you a data scientist, economist, mathematician, technical geographer, or similar, who loves to work with data, find patterns in it, and then turn it into actionable intelligence? Are you a data scientist who loves to draw out insights from data, and then work collaboratively with analysts and engineers to turn those insights into automated workflows? If so, please reach out to us at EpochGeo to chat.Big data problems can be overwhelming, inaccessible, and noisy. EpochGeo is a data services firm specializing in supporting the full spectrum data cycle: beginning with scalable data storage and ending in producing impactful analytics. Our developers, analysts, and data scientists have a proven track record applying open-source innovative technology, data science, and actionable analytics to inform customers’ data driven decisions.Your background likely includes: 1 - 5+ years of experience of data engineering, coding in python, SQL, and familiarity with Keras, Tensorflow, or PyTorch frameworks preferred.Education or experience in Data Science, Economics, Computer Science, or GeographyProven history of applying machine learning and statistical methods to complex problem sets that resulted in successful outcomes.Experience querying and integrating data flows from an Elasticsearch instance as well as presenting and retrieving data via Kibana.A bonus to have military and/or DoD/IC experience in any of the following disciplines: data science, computer vision, target development, geospatial, or statistical analysis.What you will be doing: Exploiting multiple big data environments for insights that can be automated at scale with developer assistance.Working in a dynamic environment to identify customer opportunities to apply machine learning algorithms.Creating and fine tuning machine learning hyperparameters or utilizing AutoML solutions to optimize machine learning algorithms to solve customer problem sets.Preparing data visualization products from your analysis that turn into finished intelligence products and reports.Bonus: Master’s degree in Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Economics, Geography, or a similar fieldAdditional: Must hold a TS clearanceJob Type: Full-timePay: $100,000.00 - $200,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programRelocation assistanceTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftSupplemental Pay:Bonus payEducation:High school or equivalent (Required)Experience:Data science: 1 year (Required)Python: 1 year (Preferred)Security Clearance:Top Secret (Required)Work Location:Multiple locationsWork Remotely:No",466,Washington
43,Senior Data Analyst,GEICO,"Chevy Chase, MD 20815",None,"The Data Consumption team of Data, Security & Infrastructure (DSI) department is seeking a highly motivated Senior Data Analyst to start or continue an IT career at GEICO on the Big Data project.
Teaming up with software engineers, scrum masters, leads, managers and directors, you will work in an Agile environment to make application data ingested from various partner systems consumable on the Big Data Atomic Layer.
In this role, you will coordinate with a variety of IT departments to elicit and translate high level business requirements into detailed system requirements. You will participate in the entire software development lifecycle by writing and executing test plans, finding solutions to issues during development and after deployment. You should be intellectually curious, have a solutions-oriented attitude and enjoy learning new tools and techniques.
Requirements Qualifications:
5+ years knowledge of Data transformation, Data management & ETL processes
5+ years’ experience documenting business and system requirements, processes, workflows and test plans
5+ years’ experience with Relational Database (Snowflake, Hive, Microsoft SQL, Oracle or DB2)
3+ years’ experience on writing queries using SQL
3+ years’ working knowledge of Data Vault modelling, Azure DevOps, Hadoop, Hive, Microsoft Power BI, and Python
3+ years’ working knowledge of Big Data and the Azure/Snowflake ecosystem
Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
Assists developers with more complex and detailed projects including root cause analysis, gap analysis etc.
Excellent time management skills and attention to detail is required
Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
Strong problem-solving ability, critical thinking skills, creative/innovative thinking
Ability and desire to learn new skills and techniques
Ability to thrive while working on ambiguous or challenging projects
A Bachelor's degree in a computer or information technology or currently enrolled in a degree program
Desirable Qualifications:
Proficient in SQL and be able to extract & validate data using SQL query
Ability to work independently while supporting multiple projects in a dynamic environment
Understanding of software development, web technologies, and testing approaches
Ability to discern data inaccuracies through technical experience and knowledge.
Develop an understanding of the business and the data needed to promote success
Ability to query, organize and interpret large amounts of data
Research data from key business systems, assess data quality, and map data to requirements for analysis and reporting
Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.
As a Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:
Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
Tuition Reimbursement
Paid Training and LicensuresBenefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
**Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.
The equal employment opportunity policy of the GEICO Companies provides for a fair and equal employment opportunity for all associates and job applicants regardless of race, color, religious creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, familial status, disability or genetic information, in compliance with applicable federal, state and local law. GEICO hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.
GEICO reasonably accommodates qualified individuals with disabilities to enable them to receive equal employment opportunity and/or perform the essential functions of the job, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship to the Company. This applies to all applicants and associates.
GEICO also provides a work environment in which each associate is able to be productive and work to the best of their ability. We do not condone or tolerate an atmosphere of intimidation or harassment. We expect and require the cooperation of all associates in maintaining an atmosphere free from discrimination and harassment with mutual respect by and for all associates and applicants.
#LI-AA1
#LI-AA3
#DI-AA",466,Washington
44,Senior Statistician,All In Solutions,"Washington, DC 20006 (Foggy Bottom area)","$140,000 - $200,000 a year","StatisticianEducation:  Ph.D.Years of Experience:  5 YearsBrief Description: This program is in support of the Department of Veterans Affairs, to develop methods to determine the return on investment (ROI) of the GI Bill using outcome measures and to identify, obtain, and analyze, data on the GI Bill populations. Experience working on Federal Government Contracts is a plus. Experience either using or an understanding of the GI Bill is also a plus.The Statistician provides the mathematical basis for data-based conclusions. They decide what data is required to answer specific questions and problems. The Statistician applies mathematical theories and techniques, designs data collection, develops mathematical and statistical models, Interprets data, and reports conclusions drawn from analysis.Responsibilities: Interface with various database platforms to pull data and link them logically; know how to deal with the inherent structure of the data.Use SAS and/or R to perform standard statistical analysis, profiling, reporting and model implementation.Build statistical models, such as linear or logistic regression, survival and other parametric or non-parametric models that predict various business metrics.Summarize and present results for non-technical client audience.Work with senior Analytics personnel to develop new methods for statistical analysis and visualization.QualificationsPhd in Statistics, Applied Math, Econometrics or closely related field.5 years of work experience.3 or more academic publications in the past 5 years.A deep understanding of various statistical methods, such as linear and logistic regression, time series, design of experiments, etc. Experience with survival analysis (i.e. censored data) is preferred.Statistical programming experience: SAS programming and ability to use base SAS and SQL to deal with various analytical and data processing tasks, and/or; R programming and ability to use R statistical, reporting and database packages to deal with various analytical and data processing tasksExperience working with large datasets and complex relational data modelsEffective oral and written communication skillsExperience providing Project Management on Federal Government ProgramsStrong interpersonal skillsUnited States Work Authorization is RequiredJob Type: Full-timePay: $140,000.00 - $200,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayApplication Question(s):How many academic publications have you published in the past 5 years?Education:Doctorate (Required)Experience:statistical modeling: 5 years (Required)Power BI: 1 year (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Yes",466,Washington
45,Sr. Customer Engineer - Data Analyst/PowerBI- CTJ,Microsoft,"Reston, VA 20190 (Sunset Hills area)",None,"Microsoft is on a mission to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. Our culture is centered on embracing a growth mindset, a theme of inspiring excellence, and encouraging teams and leaders to bring their best each day. Growth mindset encourages each of us to lean in and learn what matters most to our customers, to create the foundational knowledge that enables us to make customer-first decisions in everything we do. In doing so, we create life-changing innovations that impact billions of lives around the world. You can help us achieve our mission.
Microsoft Federal
Microsoft Federal delivers a single unified organization centered around our customer: All critical customer functions are brought under the same organizational umbrella. Bringing together the breadth and depth in our space with a razor sharp focus on serving the U.S. Government. Our federal customers’ expectations of how to contract, interact, and partner with us are changing, and they need to evolve at the pace of the private sector. Launching a nimble, empowered organization with comprehensive resources allows us to work hand in hand with our customers to accelerate their technology innovation, whether through R&D or through direct contracting.
Microsoft Federal serves the U.S. Government (USG), allowing Microsoft to support the growing government business. The organization supports the capabilities and requirements to service USG through direct sales, contracting, and billing with the USG. Microsoft Federal entity will meet obligations of manage contracts with the USG through six business teams and three enablement teams.
We are committed to empowering our teams, building upon our strategic investments, and delivering the technology to achieve federal missions. As our federal customers pursue their work, from defending the nation, to serving its citizens in challenging times, they look to Microsoft to help them innovate, and they expect end-to-end engagement tailored to their needs.
Microsoft has been committed to and continues to heavily invest in supporting our Federal Government. Microsoft Federal offers our full spectrum of products and services, including hardware, software, online products, and consulting and services.
Join us and be one who helps to empower the US government! That’s incredible reach. When you combine that with your own inspiration, plus the freedom and support to make your ideas happen, you can make a huge impact.
Do you have a passion for Business Intelligence? Do you love to solve problems and help improve the quality of Microsoft's products? Are you customer obsessed and have a growth mindset? If so, this is a great opportunity for you. Microsoft Federal is looking for a Customer Engineer. In this role you will be working with customers and partners in large enterprise environments supporting and optimizing data visualization and data structures and data models to design, develop, and tune BI solutions and reports while delivering with high quality on meaningful engagements. You will also be responsible for customer satisfaction, deployment, adoption, and support of enterprise Microsoft deployments.
Microsoft is on a mission to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. Our culture is centered on embracing a growth mindset, a theme of inspiring excellence, and encouraging teams and leaders to bring their best each day. In doing so, we create life-changing innovations that impact billions of lives around the world. You can help us to achieve our mission.
Microsoft Federal is a U.S. team that is fully dedicated to meeting the mission needs of our Federal Government customers. As part of our team, you will help customers unlock the value of their data through on premise and remote support. Microsoft aspires to help our customers achieve their own digital transformation, leveraging the power of Microsoft Cloud and BI solutions and support offerings. To this end, Microsoft invests in a dedicated Customer Success team that will help Microsoft customers successfully realize their business outcomes.
Responsibilities
Responsibilities:
As a Customer Engineer, you will be a key, deeply technical resource for the customer, primarily focused on delivering proactive services such as PowerBI education workshops, delivering assessments to optimize environments, and providing tailored guidance to assist customers with reporting and gaining business insights. The role can include a mixture of short and long-term customer engagements and can be delivered either remotely or on-premises.
As a Customer Engineer, in this role, you will support our federal customers with their PowerBI, business intelligence, reporting, visualization, and business insight needs. This includes:
Support Management (50%)
Participate in proactive account management, spot performance issues, analyze problems, develop solutions to meet customer needs, represent them.
Provide the most effective method of service delivery by analyzing trends and common themes across customers.
Engage in strategic service delivery planning, in partnership with the virtual account team, to strengthen targeted customer relationships.
Seek information about the underlying needs of customers.
Allocate and align resources to optimize the customer experience.
Develop and communicate realistic performance goals and standards.
Build plans that consider potential obstacles and immediate and long-term consequences.
Demonstrate expertise in a specific solution, or several products, feature functions, or services.
Provide stakeholder assistance throughout deployment to avoid/resolve technical issues.
Support Execution - Deliver Results through Teamwork & Optimizing Business Results (25%)
Seek opportunities to drive Customer Success business results by collaborating with multiple team members.
Identify opportunities to articulate business value and grow customer/partner relationships in alignment with Customer Success business priorities and stakeholder management principles.
Provide and drive actionable feedback across groups about the customer/partner experience and competitor threats.
Modify existing intellectual property (IP) or, where applicable, creates new content.
Leadership and Growing the Business (25%)
Consistently apply ""lessons learned"", model personal accountability & teamwork.
Demonstrate an understanding of his or her role and contribution to customer/partner change management and adoption initiatives.
Understand customer/partner requirements and map the adoption and optimization of Microsoft technology solutions accordingly.
Drive and support innovation focusing on industry solutions and customer business outcomes on the Microsoft platform.
Contribute and participate in meetings to articulate Premier offerings to all customers; share knowledge through communities, adapt for customers.
Cultivate relationships, credibility, and loyalty with customers and partners intentionally by sharing relevant business expertise.
Be a demonstrated self-learner.
Qualifications
Required qualifications:
This role is aligned to the Data & AI solution area. We are looking for experts with a strong understanding and experience in data analytics and PowerBI. You will have the opportunity to work on BI solutions, collaborate strongly with different teams, and deliver value to customers across Microsoft Federal.
At least 3+ years of Business Intelligence experience like ETL, data warehousing management, data mining, report designer or developer in an enterprise environment
Deep technical experience in Business intelligence combining knowledge of PowerBI, SSIS, SSAS, SSRS technologies with a deep understanding of data structure and data models to design, develop, and tune BI solutions and reports.
Technical delivery and customer facing presentation skills with a high degree of comfort with both large and small audiences
Must have the ability to take on internal initiatives to create opportunities, and work in a fast-paced environment while balancing multiple demands, addressing shifting priorities, and maintaining focus
Bachelor’s degree (BS/BA) in Computer Science or Information Systems or equivalent work experience
Extensive experience developing and deploying reports, dashboards, and metrics
Ability to match technical solutions with customer business requirements
Ability to effectively recognize and adapt to change
Experience with staging data for the purposes of improved read performance
Possess strong expertise in MSBI stack including SSRS, SSIS, SSAS with advanced T-SQL
Expertise in tabular and multidimensional queries (DAX, MDX)
Experience with BI solutions and working with Cloud BI tools
Experience in ETL implementation using SSIS
Expert in defining queries for generating drill down and drill through reports in SSRS or PowerBI
Direct experience writing SQL within MS SQL Server & SSRS
Ability to communicate with a variety of different audiences and strong presentation skills
Ability to lead and motivate technical communities
Travel is an integral part of this position. You should be willing to travel as is demanded by the needs of our customers and our business. Travel ranges from 25% to 75% depending on location.
The candidate can live anywhere in the U.S. and willing to travel to Tampa, FL on a weekly basis.
The successful candidate must be a U.S. Citizen.
Citizenship Verification: This position requires verification of US Citizenship to meet federal government security requirements.
The successful candidate must have an active U.S. Government Top Secret Security Clearance. Ability to meet Microsoft, customer and/or government security screening requirements are required for this role. Failure to maintain or obtain the appropriate clearance and/or customer screening requirements may result in employment action up to and including termination.
Clearance Verification: This position requires successful verification of the stated security clearance to meet federal government customer requirements. You will be asked to provide clearance verification information prior to an offer of employment.
Cloud Screening: Candidates must be able to successfully complete and pass a Microsoft Cloud background screening. Required Cloud Screenings will be administered on a recurring bi-annual basis.
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application or the recruiting process, please send a request via the Accommodation request form.
Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work.
#FederalCareers",466,Washington
46,Data Scientist Senior Consultant,Deloitte,"Arlington, VA",None,"Data Scientist
Do you want to build your brand by working for a leading consulting firm that drives eminence in the marketplace? Are you interested in leveraging your analytical skills and strategic ideas to improve mission execution? If so, Deloitte could be the place for you! Our Government Public Services Strategy and Analytics team brings deep industry expertise, rigorous analytical capabilities and a pragmatic mindset to help solve our client's most complex business problems. Join our team and play a key role in helping to design our clients' roadmap to the future and help transform the GPS marketplace.
Work you'll do
The Data Scientist will join a team responsible for developing advanced analytics products; applying data visualization and statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable key mission outcomes. In this role, they will support all phases of analytic work product development, from the identification of key business questions to ETL, from performing analyses to delivery of insights to decision-makers, with particular attention to the interplay between data and the business processes that produce and consume it.
Travel up to 10% (While 10% of travel is a requirement of the role, due to COVID-19, non-essential travel has been suspended until further notice.)
The team
Analytics & Cognitive
In this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the future with confidence, embracing decision making with clear, data-driven choices that deliver enterprise value in a dynamic business environment.
The Analytics & Cognitive team leverages the power of data, analytics, robotics, science and cognitive technologies to uncover hidden relationships from vast troves of data, generate insights, and inform decision-making. Together with the Strategy practice, our Strategy & Analytics portfolio helps clients transform their business by architecting organizational intelligence programs and differentiated strategies to win in their chosen markets.
Analytics & Cognitive will work with our clients to:

Implement large-scale data ecosystems including data management, governance and the integration of structured and unstructured data to generate insights leveraging cloud-based platforms
Leverage automation, cognitive and science-based techniques to manage data, predict scenarios and prescribe actions
Drive operational efficiency by maintaining their data ecosystems, sourcing analytics expertise and providing As-a-Service offerings for continuous insights and improvements
Qualifications
Basic:
Bachelors degree in a STEM related field
4+ relevant experience within data science
Experience with programming languages such as Python, R, and VBA; and query languages such as SQL
Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik, PowerBI, d3.js and other web application technologies, or equivalent
Experience with SQL and NoSQL database technologies such as SQL Server, Oracle SQL
Basic understanding and experience within data engineering
Proficiency with data extraction, transformation, and loading to support advanced analytics
Experience with a wide range of analytics techniques, such as statistics, machine learning, natural language processing, optimization, simulation, or closely related techniques
Strong strategic communication skills to include presenting quantitative concepts in easy to understand formats and actively listening to identify business problems and their causes
A curious, questioning attitude that leads them to look past superficial appearances to find deeper problems, insights, and solutions
Thrives in fast-paced work environment with multiple stakeholders
High-performing team player who believes that cross-functional teams are greater than the sum of its parts
Must be able to obtain/maintain a minimum of a Secret clearance
Preferred:
2+ years of relevant consulting or industry experience
Familiarity with cloud computing technology, especially Microsoft Azure
Familiarity with Agile project management principles
Confidence to drive assignments to completion
Eagerness to learn and develop
How you'll grow
At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there's always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs at Deloitte University, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career. Explore Deloitte University, The Leadership Center.
Benefits
At Deloitte, we know that great people make a great organization. We value our people and offer employees a broad range of benefits. Learn more about what working at Deloitte can mean for you.
Deloitte's culture
Our positive and supportive culture encourages our people to do their best work every day. We celebrate individuals by recognizing their uniqueness and offering them the flexibility to make daily choices that can help them to be healthy, centered, confident, and aware. We offer well-being programs and are continuously looking for new ways to maintain a culture where our people excel and lead healthy, happy lives. Learn more about Life at Deloitte.
Corporate citizenship
Deloitte is led by a purpose: to make an impact that matters. This purpose defines who we are and extends to relationships with our clients, our people and our communities. We believe that business has the power to inspire and transform. We focus on education, giving, skill-based volunteerism, and leadership to help drive positive social impact in our communities. Learn more about Deloitte's impact on the world.
Recruiter tips
We want job seekers exploring opportunities at Deloitte to feel prepared and confident. To help you with your interview, we suggest that you do your research: know some background about the organization and the business area you're applying to. Check out recruiting tips from Deloitte professionals.
AIGPS",466,Washington
47,Senior Data Analyst (MDM),Hilton Corporate,"McLean, VA 22102",None,"(
Job Number:
 COR0117I )
Work Locations
:
Hilton - Systems Solutions - McLean
7930 Jones Branch Drive
 McLean 22102
***This position can sit in McLean, VA or Remotely, except for within the state of Colorado***
From smartphone capabilities like Digital Key to connected rooms that allow for integrated entertainment, temperature, and lighting controls, Hilton’s Global Technology team is responsible for creating the hospitality experience of the future – for our guests, owners, and Team Members. Through innovative technology development and deployment, this team ensures Hilton has the technology needed to support our continued global growth while remaining at the forefront of hospitality technology innovation.
What will I be doing?
Master data management (MDM) involves crafting a single master record for each person, organization, property, or product in a business, from across internal and external data sources and applications. Data governance and MDM are essential to our successful business practices as Hilton puts growing importance on data-driven decisions in today’s global marketplace —and as a growing number of systems contribute digital records of the people, places, and things that matter most to a business.
As the Senior Data Analyst on the Enterprise Data Governance team, you will be tasked with handling and maintaining the processes surrounding our master data. This data is essential to our data science, operations, and reporting, and analytics teams, as well as the enterprise as a whole.
Coordinate, maintain, and respond to incidents within Hilton’s Informatica Master Data Management Platform
Build and define data structures to house enterprise master data
Develop data integration workflows and services to move data to and from our master data hub
Coordinate with data stewards to ensure timeliness and accuracy of master data
Define business process workflows, matching, cleansing, and data quality rules to address master data issues
Problem-solve and capture requirements for unique master data edge cases, ensuring we address our customers and team members needs, whilst aligning with industry-standard methodologies
Analyze Hilton data sets to understand gaps and opportunities, and assessing data quality
What are we looking for?
We believe the success in this role will demonstrate itself through the following attributes and skills:
Solid grasp of relational databases, and to write and understand complex SQL queries.
Proficiency with Master Data Management concepts, understanding what master data is and why it is meaningful to an enterprise.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. The ability to break down complex problems into requisite parts and design efficient, scalable solutions.
Experience with technical environments, with a solid understanding of database design and modeling, network connectivity, security, and scripting.
To fulfill this role successfully, you should demonstrate the following minimum qualifications:
Five (5) years of work experience in Technology or a related field
Three (3) years of experience working with Informatica’s product suite including PowerCenter and Multidomain MDM Hub
It would be helpful in this position for you to demonstrate the following capabilities and distinctions:
Bachelor’s Degree, or Associate’s Degree plus six (6+) years of Technology related experience, or High School Degree/GED plus twelve (12+) years of Technology related experience
Seven (7) years of work experience in Technology or a related field
Four (4) years working with Master Data Management tools like Informatica, Tibco, Talend, Reltio, or similar
Four (4) years spent working with Data integration tools such as Informatica, Pentaho, Talend, Alteryx, or similar
Experience with batch, near real-time, and real-time data integration patterns, such as web services, APIs, and messaging queues
Experience with relational data structures, modeling and defining tables and views to present hierarchical, recursive, and denormalized data to the enterprise
Experience coding and/or scripting back end, data related workflows, and tasks in a language of your choice
What is it like working for Hilton?
Hilton is the world’s leading global hospitality company, spanning the lodging sector from luxurious full-service hotels and resorts to extended-stay suites and mid-priced hotels. For over a century, Hilton has offered business and leisure travelers the finest in accommodations, service, amenities, and value. Hilton is dedicated to continuing its tradition of providing exceptional guest experiences across its global brands. Our vision to fill the earth with the light and warmth of hospitality unites us as a team to create remarkable hospitality experiences around the world every day. And, our amazing Team Members are at the heart of it all!
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We will ensure that qualified individuals with protected disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions of his or her role, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.
EOE/AA/Disabled/Veterans
Schedule
: Full-time
Brand : Hilton Corporate
Shift
: Day Job
Job Level
: Team Member
Job
: Technology",466,Washington
48,"Graph Data Scientist, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Arlington, VA",None,"The Challenge:
Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the potential of network graphs? Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by combining machine learning and graph analysis? In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of data are being gathered that are often best analyzed using concepts such as relationships and connectedness. As a data scientist specializing in graph analysis, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges. Across private and public sectors — from fraud detection, to social network analysis, to national intelligence — you know the answers can be found in the data.
We have an opportunity for you to use your leadership and analytical skills to improve how organizations use data. You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, and then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle. You’ll mentor teammates, develop algorithms, write scripts, build network graphs, apply machine learning, and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help customers make informed decisions. You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it. As a technical leader, you’ll identify new opportunities to use data science solutions to help them meet their toughest challenges. Join us as we use data science and graph analysis to shape industries and prepare them for the future today.
Empower change with us.
You Have:
4+ years of experience within data science, machine learning engineering, or data analytics
Experience with network graph analysis and graph theory
Experience with statistical concepts, including graph-based models such as Exponential Random Graph Models (ERGMs) and Graph Convolutional Neural Networks (GCNN)
Experience in programming languages, including Python and groovy
Knowledge of graph databases and tools, including neo4j, GraphX and Gremlin-compliant graphs
Ability to develop and train Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning algorithms
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:
Experience with software development processes, including Agile
Experience with NiFi, especially development experience
Experience with Spark
Experience in a JVM-stack
Knowledge of web development including Java Springboot, node.js and Python Flask
MA or MS degree in Engineering, Physics, or Mathematics, Data Science, Industrial and Organizational Psychology
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
Build Your Career:
At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics and we’re dedicated to helping you grow as a data analysis professional. When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the chance to:
Access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Databricks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
Change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
Participate in partnerships with data science leaders, like our partnership with NVIDIA to deliver Deep Learning Institute (DLI) training to the federal government
You’ll have access to a wealth of training resources through our Analytics University, an online learning portal specifically geared towards data science and analytics skills, where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and state-of-the-art tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, on-site bootcamps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",466,Washington
49,Senior Data Scientist HSEP5,Avantus Federal,"Washington, DC",None,"Company Overview:

Avantus Federal, a NewSpring Holdings Company, is a mission-focused services and solutions company headquartered in McLean, VA. Drawing upon its heritage companies’ histories of consistent growth and high performance in the federal services market, Avantus ensures eminence is earned, sustained and grown.
Avantus’ services and solutions are designed, tailored, and executed based on our long history of helping our Homeland Security, Defense, Intelligence, and Federal Civilian customers solve complex challenges. Our capabilities include Project & Portfolio Management, Facilities, Acquisition & Sustainment, Systems Engineering Technical Services, Operations & Analysis, Transformation & Advisory Services, Data & Software Solutions, Digital Innovation, and Augmented Intelligence.
Position Overview:

Avantus is seeking a well qualified Senior Data Scientist to over see a medium to large scale development project assisting our clients in the Homeland Security Enterprise. The Senior Data Scientist will be leading a team to develop and deploy machine learning/applications solutions, implement best practices, and contribute to overall mentorship and development of junior staff.
Responsibilities:
Project Lead in a project management environment – independently and with Sponsor team
Support leadership teams to facilitate meetings with functional leads and subject matter experts to identify, develop, document, and validate requirements.
Lead the development and deployment of machine learning solutions through production.
Work with structured and unstructured data, and leverage skills using: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Janus Graph, H-Base, RESTful frameworks, etc.
Support the preparation and update briefings used by Avantus and client leadership.
Working with structured and unstructured data, SQL, database modeling
Project management / Agile management
Executive briefings
Required Qualifications:
Ability to obtain and maintain TS-S/CI clearance.
Intermediate to expert level skills in middle-tier and back-end development
3+ years of experience with:
Java-SpringBoot
Janus Graph
Python
NiFi
Tensor Flow
Spark
Data Modeling
Outlier Detection
Regression, A/B Testing, Classification, and Cluster Algorithms
ML Modeling Frameworks: SKLearn, Keras, PyTorch, Kafka
Strong knowledge of concepts, methodologies and best practices in migrating development risks, estimating tasks, coding standards and source control procedures.
Preferred Qualifications:
TS-S/CI clearance
Company EEO Statement:

Avantus Federal is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, status as a qualified individual with a disability, or any other category protected by law. Avantus hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",466,Washington
50,Senior Data Science Engineer,Alldus,"Arlington, VA",None,"About Us

Our mission is to defend vulnerable vehicles from cyberattack. Out product deploys hardware and software onto both military & civilian platforms— from Space, Air, Land, & Sea infrastructure. As a rapidly growing, VC-Backed startup, we offer an incredibly challenging environment solving one of the more complex problems of our time.

Role & Responsibilities:

As a senior data science engineer you will be responsible for planning, developing, and optimizing algorithms/models for real-time data ingestion, distribution, & analyzing data to solve and address complex problems.

Tech Stack:
Our core platform is primarily coded in high performance modern C++
Python (TensorFlow, Sci-kit, Keras. NumPy, Pandas)
Kubernetes, Docker, Node, Elastic, Django, Jinja, and Google Protocol Buffers",466,Washington
51,Senior/Lead Data Scientist,DataLab USA,"Germantown, MD 20876",None,"Senior/Lead Data Scientist (5-7 years work experience)Company DescriptionDataLab USA is an analytics and technology driven database marketing consultancy. We combine sophisticated technology, cutting edge analytics and an intrinsic understanding of marketing to build large-scale addressable marketing programs for Fortune 500 companies. Our clients operate in multiple verticals: Financial Services, Insurance, Telcom, and Travel & Leisure.Key responsibilities/duties include: · Build, implement and maintain predictive models through their full lifecycle.· Identify patterns & trends in data, and provides insights to enhance business decision making.· Identify challenges and opportunities from client strategy discussions and taking ownership of solution.· Work with team to develop and maintain complex analytic frameworks that may include 50+ predictive models.· Set up and monitor monthly model recalibration process.· Generate complex ad-hoc analyses combining disparate concepts or creating new approaches.· Design and create new analytic procedures & automation.· Review corporate model scoring QC.· Review corporate data transformation QC.Education and Experience: · 5 years of machine learning and analytics experience· 5 years of quantitative marketing experience· MS/PHD in a quantitative discipline or BS in a quantitative discipline with commensurate experience· Experience with R, Python, & SQL· Ability to present advanced analytical methodology and results to non-technical audiences.· Analytically minded, specifically comfortable with data, response metrics and trends· Excellent written and verbal communication skills· Ability to analyze problems and produce a viable solution· Ability to coordinate across different internal groups· Experience with Tableau (or other data visualization platform)· Experience with Excel· Financial or insurance industry experience strongly preferred· 5-7 years of Database Marketing and Data Mining experience preferredDataLab USA is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:SQL: 3 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationCompany's website:www.datalabusa.comBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyOnly full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:No",466,Washington
52,Interdisciplinary Senior Mathematical Statistician / Statistician,US Government Accountability Office,"Washington, DC","$97,481 - $136,749 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Applied Research and Methods (ARM), Center for Statistics and Data Analysis (CSDA). The CSDA contributes to the quality of GAO's work by providing assistance with data using descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics and statistical methods. To learn more about ARM and its Centers, please visit us on the web at: ARM

Responsibilities
The Center for Statistics and Data Analysis is seeking an experienced professional to serve as a Senior Mathematical Statistician or Statistician to provide consultative services and support to mission teams on the selection and implementation of appropriate statistical methodologies for engagements in accordance with GAO and professional standards. Duties involve, but are not limited to, the following:
Participating in aspects of design, researchable question development, data collection and analysis, message development, and report writing with respect to sampling, statistical, and analytical issues, and ensures the quality and value of the final product.Developing and/or applying methods based on statistical theory to implement statistical modeling techniques, such as multivariate and regression analyses, or complex sample design, selection and analysis.Conducting complex statistical analyses using various statistical software, such as SAS, Stata, and R; interpreting and presenting statistical results, and advising staff on statistical matters.Preparing and reviewing technical documentation related to statistical analysis, interpretation of statistical results, sample design, or sample estimates in a manner appropriate for the audience.Advising on how data should be collected for engagements. Selects, refines, organizes, and presents factual information and analysis in support of engagement objectives. In collaboration with engagement team members, decides on scope, form, content, and depth of analysis. Develops sample designs for probability and non-probability samples, performs sample selection, and produces estimates from sample data derived from probability samples.Contributing to primary data collection. Evaluates and analyzes data to determine relevance and reliability. As required, performs indexing and referencing tasks to support sample designs, estimates, and statistical analyses.Developing findings and recommendations and preparing GAO products that provide factual and analytical information in a clear, balanced manner that meets the needs of congressional clients. Performs statistical analyses, interprets and presents statistical results, assists team members to identify how data from samples and statistical analyses support findings and recommendations, and advises staff on matters relating to statistical issues, data analysis, and evidence.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Occasional travel may be required.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
NA
Job family (Series)
1529 Mathematical Statistics
1530 Statistics
Similar jobs
Statisticians
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen or national.
You must be suitable for federal employment.
You will be required to submit a financial disclosure statement.
Completion of a probationary period is required.
Registrated for Selective Service, if appicable.
You must possess the education and specialized experience as described to be determined basically qualified for this position.

All requirements must be met before the closing date of the announcement.
Qualifications
In addition to the education requirement, you must have 1 year (52 weeks) of specialized experience at the next lower band or level equivalent to the GS-12 in the Federal Service, or comparable private or public sector experience which has equipped you with the skills and knowledge to successfully perform the duties of the position. Specialized experience for this position is defined as practical and theoretical experience performing multivariate modeling, sampling, estimation, and other statistical analysis independently, to meet overall objectives.

You must meet all qualifications requirements BEFORE the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This position has a positive education requirement. Documentation to verify your education MUST be submitted with your application in order to be considered.

BASIC REQUIREMENTS FOR THE MATHEMATICAL STATISTICIAN SERIES 1529:

A. Degree: that included 24 semester hours of mathematics and statistics, of which at least 12 semester hours were in mathematics and 6 semester hours were in statistics.

OR

B. Combination of education and experience - at least 24 semester hours of mathematics and statistics, including at least 12 hours in mathematics and 6 hours in statistics, as shown in A above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.

Evaluation of Education:

Courses acceptable toward meeting the mathematics course requirement of paragraphs A or B above must have included at least four of the following: differential calculus, integral calculus, advanced calculus, theory of equations, vector analysis, advanced algebra, linear algebra, mathematical logic, differential equations, or any other advanced course in mathematics for which one of these was a prerequisite. Courses in mathematical statistics or probability theory with a prerequisite of elementary calculus or more advanced courses will be accepted toward meeting the mathematics requirements, with the provision that the same course cannot be counted toward both the mathematics and the statistics requirement.

Evaluation of Experience:

The experience offered in combination with educational courses to meet the requirements in paragraph B above should include evidence of statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying known statistical techniques to data such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.

Without other indications of statistical experience, work required in the processing of numerical or quantified information by other than statistical methods is not considered appropriate qualifying experience. Examples of such nonqualifying work include statistical clerical work; statistical drafting; calculation of totals, averages, percentages, or other arithmetic summations; preparation of simple tables or charts; or verification of data by simple comparison or proofreading.

BASIC REQUIREMENTS FOR THE MATHEMATICAL STATISTICIAN SERIES 1530:

A. Degree: that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc. Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.

OR

B. Combination of education and experience - courses as shown in A above, plus appropriate experience or additional education. The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Additional information
This is a bargaining unit position.

Based on the staffing needs, additional selections may be made through this vacancy announcement.

Selectee will be required to file a Financial Disclosure Statement. (if applicable)

Travel and relocation expenses will not be paid for by the GAO.

Males born after 12/31/59 and at least 18 years of age must be registered with the Selective Service System. Visit SSS.

Selectees will be required to complete questions contained on the Declaration for Federal Employment (OF-306) at the time a tentative job offer is made. At the time of appointment, selectees will be required to update the OF-306.

Selectees will be subject to a determination of suitability for Federal employment.

GAO provides reasonable accommodations to applicants and employees with disabilities. To request accommodation, please email ReasonableAccommodation@gao.gov.

GAO's policy is to provide equal employment opportunity for all regardless of race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy), national origin, age, disability, genetic information, sexual orientation, or gender identity.

GAO is part of the Legislative Branch of the Federal government. As such, all positions are in the excepted service. Initial appointments, permanent or indefinite, to the GAO require completion of a probationary period.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
If you meet the qualification requirements stated, you will be further rated based on your responses to the assessment questions. Please make sure that your responses to the assessment questions are supported in your resume.

Please follow all instructions carefully. If you provide incomplete answers, fail to provide a narrative response to any assessment question(s) that requires further explanation, or if your response to an assessment question is ""see resume”, your rating may be affected or you may be determined ineligible.

All applicants will be rated based on their responses to the assessment questions, in conjunction with the following Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA’s):

Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques, theories and practices relevant to analyses using a variety of modeling methods including multivariate, regression, hierarchical linear models, factor analysis, time series, spatial analyses, or complex sample design and estimation.
Skill in using statistical software such as SAS, Stata, or R to perform complex statistical analysis.
Skill in developing and applying appropriate statistical analyses such as least squares, maximum likelihood, Bayesian modeling, estimation, and computing methods; predictive modeling; logistic or other generalized linear models, and robust regression.
Skill in developing and applying appropriate statistical methodologies for developing complex survey sample designs or other multivariate statistical analyses.
Skill in selecting, organizing, and presenting appropriate information in a concise and balanced manner and to communicate such information to target audiences.
Ability to collaborate and work effectively as part of a team.


To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Resume: Must be created using the USAJOBS resume builder and show relevant work experience.

SF-50: Current and former federal employees eligible for reinstatement must submit a copy of your most recent Notification of Personnel Action (SF-50) that indicates Federal status, grade, tenure and type of service.
Transcripts: If you are using your education to qualify (even partially), you must submit a copy of your transcripts. Foreign Education: If you are submitting a transcript from a non-US educational institution, applicants must submit all necessary documents to a private U.S. organization that specializes in interpretation of foreign educational credentials, commonly called a credential evaluation service.
- Veteran Hiring Authority Eligibles: VEOA and 30% Disabled Veterans must submit adequate proof of active service in the Armed Forces including Member 4 copy of your DD-214, which indicates character of service. To claim 10-point veterans' preference, you must also submit an SF-15 and a letter from the Department of Veterans Affairs verifying the percentage of your disability and preference in hiring. To claim 5-Point veterans' preference, you must submit a Member 4 copy of the DD - 214 or if you are currently active duty: an official statement of service from your command.

Disability: If you are applying under the Schedule A hiring Authority for individuals with disabilities you must submit proof disability.

If you fail to submit any of the documentation listed above your application will be considered incomplete, and will result in loss of consideration.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Individuals selected will be eligible for a full range of federal employment benefits including vacation and sick leave, retirement coverage and Thrift Savings Plan, and health and life insurance. Benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
The GAO is part of the Legislative Branch of the Federal government. As such, all positions are in the excepted service. Applicants employed by other federal excepted service agencies who do not have status gained in the competitive service must apply to GAO-21-ARM-1529/1530-03DEU to receive consideration.",466,Washington
53,J-5 - Senior Data Scientist,"Technology, Automation, and Management, Inc.","Falls Church, VA 22042",None,"Description of Responsibilities: Provides high level functional and systems analysis, design integration, documentation, and implementation advice on exceptionally complex systems, which require an expert knowledge of the subject matter for effective problem solution. Participates in all phases of program development and implementation with emphasis on the planning, analysis, documentation, and presentation phases. Applies higher level mathematical principles and methods to data analytics, business intelligence and related IT systems or sciences to arrive at automated solutions.

Conducts existing IT systems reviews. Conducts data analytics and business intelligence Needs Assessments. Evaluates data models and tools; interprets and communicates analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners and executive decision makers. Conducts integration planning and scheduling for installations supporting Data Analytics and Business Intelligence (DA&BI) Centralization. Leverage large sets of structured and unstructured data for dashboard development. Conducts systems integration to affect data analysis and manipulation, dashboard reporting, big data analysis, metrics, Key Performance Measures (KPI’s) and data visualization. Guides software and data management teams in designing rigorous testing of new software on existing and legacy systems within the customer’s environment.

Provide expertise using tools such as standard query language (SQL) for relational database management systems, and others.

Required Qualifications: Master’s Degree, or Bachelor’s degree with twelve-years of experience in a related field. Experience with data analytics and business intelligence tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, Data wrapper or Open Refine preferred. Experience with languages and tools, such as AWS, Azure, and other Cloud-Centric Solutions, IoT, other Cloud Platforms; Open Source technologies and tools; Microservices/SaaS/PaaS Design and Implementation; Java, J2EE, J2SE; Ruby on Rails, PHP, AngularJS, Bootstrap, JQuery, JavaScript; Systems and Application Security. Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite.

Clearance and Other Requirements: SECRET Clearance. U.S. Citizenship.",466,Washington
54,Senior Statistician Late CVRM,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD 20878",None,"Those who join AstraZeneca not only feel a sense of ownership about their future, but also know that their work has a huge impact to patients. They thrive with a recognized leader in the industry. AstraZeneca is a nimble organization that values smart risk-takers and has a strong commitment to the employees.
With AstraZeneca , you will be applying innovative and creative approaches to science while being at the forefront of a strong and rich pipeline of cutting-edge medicines. Here, you will join passionate professionals who push the boundary of science and technology to develop and deliver life-changing medicines designed to help people live better lives. As a Statistician, you will be a part of a strong global biometrics team, and you will be a strategic partner to the clinical team. You will excel in an environment characterized by respect, integrity and growth opportunities.
Our cardiovascular, renal and metabolism pipeline includes investigational therapies in varied stages of clinical development, from recently approved products to earlier-stage molecules in clinical trials. We aspire to transform the lives of patients, working not only to prolong patients’ lives, but to also improve their function and help patients feel better. .
Senior Statistician
We have an exciting opportunity for a Sr. Statistician depending on your level of experience located in our Gaithersburg Maryland Office. In this role, we will give you the chance to utilize your statistical expertise in the design, analysis, and interpretation of clinical trial programs; submission and defense of regulatory filings; and the generation of evidence to support product commercialization and reimbursement.
Main Duties and Responsibilities
You will use your statistical knowhow to contribute to the design and progress of clinical trial programs. We offer a role suited perfectly for your competence.
Your responsibilities will include:
Contribute to or lead the statistical thinking, analysis and reporting to relevant groups in product and study teams
Conduct analyses of internal and external information to inform design decisions and the development of decision criteria
Contribute to the regulatory submissions including specification of overview documents and response to regulatory questions
Contributes to the development of best practice to improve quality, efficiency and effectiveness
Apply expert skills to investigate and use standard, as well as novel, statistical approaches for relevant statistical issues. This includes application of modelling and simulation to improve study design, and identification of opportunities to improve statistical methodology and/or provide practical solutions for problems.
Essential Requirements
You are focused on solving challenging problems through teamwork and partnerships. You are an expert, or seek to be an expert, in your field, and you know that the best results are achieved by utilizing the strengths of every individual.
You have a Master’s or Doctorate degree in Statistics, Biostatistics, Mathematics or similar area
You possess excellent interpersonal skills, especially when communicating statistical concepts to non-statisticians
You are quality focus
You have the ability to apply statistical expertise to complex problems, problem solving and quality focus.",466,Washington
55,Senior Data Analyst,Compass,"Washington, DC",None,"At Compass, we envision a world where the experience of selling or buying a home is simple and pleasant for everyone. Founded in 2012, Compass provides an end-to-end platform that empowers residential real estate agents to deliver exceptional service to their seller and buyer clients, all in service of our mission to help everyone find their place in the world.
The Data Product team's mission is to envision, build, and deploy the next generation end-to-end platform for real estate data ingestion, processing, storage, serving, and analysis at massive scale to provide leverage for Compass. Every team and agent at Compass relies on our platform to make data-informed decisions as they grow their business on top of this strong foundation.

About This Role

In this role, you will help Compass become the leading source of real estate information by expanding our geographic coverage, introducing new data types and sources, and ensuring the highest data quality standards are met. You will work cross-functionally with company leadership, product managers, engineers, support teams, and other analysts to grow and maintain the Compass data platform.

Responsibilities

Support our expansion team in efficiently onboarding new data sources with a high bar for quality
Create, test, monitor, and improve key data quality metrics tied to the data quality, platform availability, data freshness, customer experience, etc
Serve as a subject matter expert and escalation point on data quality issues reported by front-line customer and product support teams
Directly interface with third party data sources during onboarding and change or incident management activities
Create and maintain operational and analytical scripts, or other tools to swiftly resolve data quality issues or drive actionable decision-making
Leverage data to build conviction and consensus around prioritizing features that improve the customer experience and scale the business
Confirm feature release readiness by performing ad hoc analyses and tests in support of new product development
Advocate for process improvements to drive our data platform forward with a metrics-driven, continuous improvement approach
Quickly synthesize ambiguous customer problems into clear situation analyses, summarizing the impact radius, solution options, and trade-offs of each

What We Look For

4+ years experience in software product, project management, or engineering roles, building and launching successful data-driven products at scale
Experience manipulating large datasets using various tools or techniques, including Python/Google Apps scripting, SQL, pivot tables, lookups
Looking for people with expertise in data forensics, and who are detail-oriented, outstanding communicators, and are quick to learn new technologies/concepts
Preference given to candidates with 2+ years experience designing, implementing, and maintaining databases and/or data conversion/ETL pipelines
B.A., B.S., or similar degree in a technical discipline (Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics) is strongly preferred
Knowledge of, or prior experience with, real estate data integrations is a plus
Do your best work, be your authentic self

At Compass, we believe that everyone deserves to find their place in the world — a place where they feel like they belong, where they can be their authentic selves, where they can thrive. Our collaborative, energetic culture is grounded in our Compass Entrepreneurship Principles and our commitment to diversity, equity, inclusion, growth and mobility. As an equal opportunity employer, we offer competitive compensation packages, robust benefits and professional growth opportunities aimed at helping to improve our employees' lives and careers.

Notice for California Applicants",466,Washington
56,"Infrastructure Data Scientist, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Fort Meade, MD",None,"The Challenge:
Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set? Are you looking to solve complex problems found in High Performance Computing (HPC) environments? As a data scientist, you can help analyze and enable the efficient management of analytic workflows across HPC clusters. We’re looking for people to join a team where you will use machine learning algorithms, DevOps principles, and data exploration skills to the benefit of the analytic and performance engineering communities.
This role is more than just coding. We need a data scientist who will use their passion to learn new tools and techniques, identify and implement system improvements, and mentor teammates. Using a sound analytic process, you'll work with operations engineers and performance engineers to discover, explore and prepare your data, prepare and train your models and evaluate your results. You'll provide training, consulting support, or implementation guidance to other developers and operations engineers. As a technical leader, you’ll identify new opportunities to use data science solutions to help your customers meet their toughest challenges. Join us as we build systems to change our client's mission for the better.
Empower change with us.
You Have:5+ years of experience with software engineeringExperience with container technologies, including Docker or RocketExperience with DevOps techniques and tools, including continuous integration and developmentKnowledge of various Python Machine Learning libraries, including scikit-learnAbility to demonstrate software development with Python in a UNIX environmentTS/SCI clearance with a polygraphBA or BS degree or 7+ years of experience in software engineering roles in lieu of a degree
Nice If You Have:Experience with using the Atlassian Tool SuiteExperience with Agile ScrumExperience with C++Knowledge of container orchestration technologies, including Kubernetes or MesosKnowledge of HPC General Concepts
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; TS/SCI clearance with polygraph is required.
Build Your Career:
A challenging and dynamic work environment isn’t all we have to offer. When you join Booz Allen, you can expect:
access to experts in virtually every field
a culture that focuses on supporting our employees
opportunities that provide stability while offering variety
You’ll also be exposed to a wealth of training resources through our Digital University, an online learning portal featuring more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications? Take advantage of our tuition assistance, onsite boot camps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want, as you chart your own course for success.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.
#LI-AH1, CMD, IMDG",466,Washington
57,Senior Research Scientist - NLP,Adobe,"College Park, MD",None,"Our Company


Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen.


We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours!

Documents have been integral part of our day-to-day business for centuries. Today’s enterprises leverage documents to drive all essential and business critical processes and functions. Adobe PDF was, and to a large extent, still is the primary digital format for reliably sharing and distributing documents. During the last two decades of PDF’s dominance, the world around us has changed dramatically. World Wide Web, the mobile devices and advancements in AI have transformed the lives of all. In this new era of AI-powered digital business, the challenge we have is to invent, design and productize that document of the future and redefine the user experiences around the document.
As a senior research scientist in Document Intelligence Lab (DIL), you will provide technical leadership in research, architect and develop machine learning solutions at scale regards document structure, semantics understanding, knowledge extraction and auto-generation cross modalities (e.g. image, language and layout structure). You will leverage Adobe’s unique data sources and customer relationships which include not only content (such as images, videos, texts, voicees), but also how the customers interacting with those contents (such as authoring, sharing, viewing, retrieving, and collaborating) in the context of diverse verticals (e.g. financial services, healthcare, government and etc.).
In addition, you will do:
Demonstrate technical proficiency in natural language understanding, generation, knowledge extraction & constructtion and machine learning methods that deal with multi-modality data (e.g. text, image, graph, etc.)
Initiate, lead and execute research initiatives by collaborating with researchers and engineers in cross-disciplinary and cross-functional environment
Keep abreast of the latest developments in the fields by continuous learning and proactively champion new ideas and new problem definitions
Required Qualifications
PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or relevant majors with research specialization in artificial intelligence, machine learning, natural language processing and understanding, multi-modal document analysis.
Proficient in one or more programming languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala and C/C++
Familiar with one or more state-of-art deep learning frameworks, such as Tensorflow, PyTorch, Keras, Caffe, Torch.
Strong analytical and quantitative problem-solving ability.
Demonstrated track record of innovation and creativity in the machine learning domains, especially in NLP or computer vision.
Excellent communication, relationship skills and a strong team player.
Preferred Qualifications
Extensive experience of architecting and applying state-of-art deep learning techniques to NLP and computer vision applications.
Experience of working with very large data sets with multi-modal elements (image, text. Etc.).
Strong publication records in relevant areas",466,Washington
58,"Senior Statistician, Late Oncology",AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD 20878",None,"Senior Statistician
At AstraZeneca we work together across global boundaries to make an impact and find answers to challenges. We do this with the upmost integrity even in the most difficult situations because we are committed to doing the right thing. We continuously forge partnerships that help pursue world-class medicines in new ways, combining our people’s exceptional skills with those of people from all over the globe. As a Senior Statistician in Gaithersburg, MD, you’ll play a pivotal role in channeling our scientific capabilities to make a positive impact on changing patients’ lives. GMD (Global Medicines Development) drives late-stage development of our innovative pipeline, transforming exciting science into valued new medicines and ensuring patients around the world can access them.
AstraZeneca’s vision in Oncology is to help patients by redefining the cancer-treatment paradigm, with the aim of bringing six new cancer medicines to patients between 2013 and 2020. A broad pipeline of next-generation medicines is focused principally on four disease areas - breast, ovarian, lung and hematological cancers. As well as other tumor types, these are being targeted through four key platforms - immunotherapy, the genetic drivers of cancer and resistance, DNA damage repair, and antibody drug conjugates, underpinned by personalized healthcare and biomarker technologies.
Main Duties and Responsibilities
As a Senior Statistician you will provides statistical expertise in the design of experimental work and the evaluation and interpretation of experimental results in research projects and clinical trials, referring to more senior Statistical experts where necessary. You will manages own work to schedule/quality and will apply a range of Statistical methods. You will be able to solve complex problems within own area and will participate in multi disciplinary teams.
Analyses internal and external information to inform design decisions
Acts as a technical owner within Biostatistics with a deep understanding of processes and equipment employed
Provides support to the regulatory submissions including specification of overview documents and response to regulatory questions
Keeps own knowledge of best practices and new relevant developments up to date
Identifies opportunities for the application of modelling and simulation to improve study design
Identifies opportunities to improve the methodology and provide practical solutions for clinical development
Delivers tasks as agreed and presents results
Identifies and applies statistical methodology to improve the process and provide practical solutions for research/production activities
Contributes to the development, sharing and statistical support of new procedures, tools or techniques to improve quality, efficiency and effectiveness of own area
Essential Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in relevant discipline
Experience in Clinical Development
Knowledge of relevant legislation/developments in the area of Clinical Development and Biostatics
Experience as a statistician in the health care environment or relevant areas of statistical applications
Experience with f relevant software and processes
Ability to apply statistical techniques in the analysis of data from clinical studies or other relevant area
Desirable Requirements
Advanced degree within the field and/or professional certification
Understanding of multiple aspects within Biostatics and Information Sciences
Next Steps – Apply today!
To be considered for this exciting opportunity, please complete the full application on our website at your earliest convenience – it is the only way that our Recruiter and Hiring Manager can know that you feel well qualified for this opportunity. If you know someone who would be a great fit, please share this posting with them.",466,Washington
59,Senior Data Scientist,"TapHere Technology, LLC","Fairfax, VA",None,"Description: Taphere is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist to augment our team of enterprise architects and analysts working for our customer, located in Northern Virginia. Our customer supports the modernization, alignment, and integration of Combatant Command intelligence capabilities, and other Defense Intelligence Enterprise specified areas, for the Office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Intelligence and Security – OUSD(I&S).Experience Required: Essential Job ResponsibilitiesThis Data Scientist creatively approaches a variety of requirements to meet intelligence needs, can balance work on multiple tasks, and work collaboratively with other scientists, engineers, and analysts in a collaborative, dynamic, cross-functional environment. The Data Scientist is responsible for producing applied research in the intelligence field. They will apply critical thinking skills to ‘real world’ issues and be able to effectively appraise collected data/information using a variety of analytic techniques and methodologies.Specific responsibilities include but are not limited to:Extract data from a variety of sources (databases, web, text files) and in a variety of formats (structured, unstructured, JSON, etc.) and prepare the data for analysisDescribe data using qualitative and quantitative aggregation/summarization and build tools (static reports, interactive dashboards, web applications) that allow clients to easily view and understand important patterns and trends in the dataProvide quantitative comparisons of data points using advanced statistical analysis including data reduction techniques, resampling, as well as traditional statistical hypothesis testingConstruct and validate predictive models using a variety of techniquesPrepare analytic products in written, oral, visual, and/or multimedia formats.Devise open-source research and collection management practices.Facilitate and manage intelligence processes and practices.Minimum Qualifications9 years relevant experience with Bachelors in related field; 7 years relevant experience with Masters in related field; 4 years relevant experience with PhD or Juris Doctorate in realted field; or High School Diploma or equivalent and 13 years relevant experience.Experience employing analytical methods or platforms to communicate predictions, findings, or risks through effective data visualizations and reportsSecurity Clearance: Must possess and maintain an active TS/SCISkills Required: Preferred RequirementsIntelligence Community experience and understanding of the intelligence cycleDemonstrated Experience in some or all:o Text Analytics - IN-SPIRE, Jigsaw, Ro Data Analytics – Excel, PowerBI, Tableauo Document Development - Word, MS Publisher, Adobe suiteo Visual Analytics – Kibana, Virtualitics, Graphikao Visualization - Gephi, Word cloud, R or Javao Graphics Production - PowerPoint, Adobe Creative Suite, Photoshop, HTML5o Programming – Python, SQL, API Developmento Database – Database Modeling, Database Management, Database Typeso Data Ingestion – ETL/ELT, NIFI, KAFKA, ESBBack Apply NowJob Type: Full-time",466,Washington
60,"Data Engineer, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Arlington, VA",None,"Key Role:
Develop data pipelines using big data services available in the Cloud. Architect data repositories, stand up data platforms, and write custom code for data ingestion, transformation, and aggregation. Create data models to support business requirements. Work as a client-facing consultant, providing solutions to big data use cases. Develop CI and CD pipelines to support automated deployment and automated testing.
Basic Qualifications:Experience as a data scientist, data engineer, data integration analyst, or ETL developerExperience with PythonExperience with Data Visualization, including Tableau or QlikExperience with SQLAbility to obtain a security clearanceBA or BS degree
Additional Qualifications:Experience with Agile software developmentExperience with using Lucene-based search engines, including ElasticSearch or SolrExperience with Big Data ETL tools, including StreamSets and NiFiExperience with Big Data systems, including DataBricks, Hadoop, HDFS, Hive, or ClouderaExperience in working with enterprise and production systemsAbility to display a positive, can-do attitude to solve the challenges of tomorrowPossession of excellent verbal and written communication skillsHortonworks, Cloudera, or Big Data Certification
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",466,Washington
61,DRI Whacking Stick - Senior Principal Data Scientist,"Cinteot, Inc.","Falls Church, VA",None,"Job position URL:
https://cinteot.com/cinteot-careers/#!/f3cccc33-e349-48b1-864b-310f1f7326f5/detail

DRI Whacking Stick - Senior Principal Data Scientist (534)

Job Duties:

Performs AI-related software engineering and development activities using an Agile DevSecOps model
Designs and implements AI and machine learning approaches and algorithms that can be used to enhance analyst effectiveness using tools and techniques such as Java, Python, R, PySPark, and TensorFlow or similar frameworks
Creates hypotheses for and identifies relationships within data that can be leveraged using advanced analytic methods including AI and machine learning
Collaborates with other members of the scrum team to create and implement new data labeling and analytic algorithms and visualizations that codify new techniques
Develops approaches to cross-correlate data sources and ensure consistency among data-sets and builds mathematical models using the data
Works with human factors engineers and Web software developers to create visualization techniques that aid analysts in understanding data
Monitors algorithms to measure efficiency and effectiveness and provides recommendations for improvements as needed

Basic Qualifications:

A Bachelor’s degree with 9 years of relevant experience OR a Master’s degree with 7 years of relevant experience OR a PhD with 4 years of relevant experience; An additional 4 years of experience maybe considered in lieu of a degree requirement
9+ years’ experience performing AI-related software engineering and development activities supporting, maintaining, and enhancing applications using Agile methodologies
Experience with AWS, Java, Python, JSON, Spring, Spring Boot, Docker, JIRA, Git, Junit, RDBMS technology, Elasticsearch and/or SOLR, NoSQL technology (Hadoop and/or EMR, Web UI Javascript frameworks (e.g. JQuery, Angular, React)

Cinteot is an Equal Opportunity Employer

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability.",466,Washington
62,Data Analyst (Senior),"AVER, LLC","Washington, DC 20002 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"AVER is looking for a Data Analyst to support the development of analytic solutions for a multifaceted Government program. This role will be responsible for creating automated scripts to assist analysts with data discovery, as well as, developing scripts and reports to support analysts performing repeatable complex queries in multiple databases.
 Responsibilities:
Work independently and collaborate with key stakeholders, business representatives, subject matter experts, and project team members to identify and analyze capability gaps and process improvements, and development analytic solutions to make well-informed and data-driven decisions.
Build reports with Tableau, MS Access and MS Excel using complex equations.
Gather, aggregate, cleanse, and analyze business data from primary and secondary sources and maintaining databases.
Evaluate existing and develop new performance metrics to allow the customer to monitor performance across the enterprise.
Construct and perform complex database queries across multiple databases and developing analytics solutions that are repeatable and effective.
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree plus 8 years of experience.
Experience Requirements:
Proficiency with Tableau and Microsoft Excel (Vlookup, PivotTables, Charts & Graphs).
Demonstrated proficiency with database systems and tools (Microsoft Access, SQL Server, XML and SQL scripting).
Demonstrated proficiency in critical thinking and ability to use data analytic tools and experience synthesizing large amounts of data to answer questions.
Desired Requirements:
Proficiency with Oracle OBIEE and ability to run pre-written XML scripts for daily reports.
Location:
Washington, DC (Remote during Covid-19)
Security Requirements:
Position requires U.S. citizenship
Must be able to obtain a Public Trust clearance and Secret clearance
About Us
AVER, LLC is a Data & Digital Transformation that delivers exceptional client service with great people and transformative technology solutions to enable Government mission success. We provide customers with specialized technical skills and deep subject matter expertise focused on Homeland Security, Biometrics, Law Enforcement and Healthcare domains to meet the complex mission challenges today and tomorrow. We are a verified Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) that strives to provide a customer-centric experience building trusted partnerships with our clients and people.
AVER is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Jqe3H0hlSh",466,Washington
63,Senior Data Analyst,Center For Policing Equity,"Washington, DC",None,"LocationWashington DC; remote for the right candidatePosition DescriptionThe Center for Policing Equity (CPE) is looking for a highly-skilled Senior Data Analyst with at least 3 years of experience in the collection and evaluation of data. The Senior Data Analyst will be responsible for performing analysis and reporting functions for the evaluation of CPE's signature interventions using publicly available data, staff collected data, programmatic data, and data from our law enforcement partners. In addition, the Senior Data Analyst will be responsible for continuously iterating on streamlining evaluation processes, data analysis, and deliverables.This position will report to the Sr. Intervention Scientist and works in a collaborative effort with the Product Discovery Team.Key ResponsibilitiesUse qualitative and quantitative data to answer evaluation questions related to the implementation and outcomes of signature interventions (Compstat for Justice, Justice Navigator)Perform data pre-processing/wrangling tasks to prepare the data for analysisCo-develop evaluation research questions and analytic methodsTrack achievement on short/intermediate/long-term outcomes of interventionsTranslate findings into recommendations and strategy for a variety of audiencesLead continual process improvement for data analysisContribute to creation of high-quality materials for internal teams, CPE leadership, and stakeholders (i.e., reports, PowerPoint presentations, white papers)Qualifications (required)Bachelor's degree and 3+ years of relevant professional experiencePossess end-to-end data expertise including data sourcing, merging, cleaning, restructuring/wrangling, and visualizationHighly proficient statistical programming in R or similar platforms to conduct descriptive statistics, correlations, multivariate regressions, hierarchical modeling, time series analysis, etc.Expert capability to explain analytical findings in clear terms that can be understood by non-technical audiencesExperience producing interactive data visualizations to communicate findings (i.e. Tableau, PowerBI, Google DataStudio, etc.)Ability to collaborate effectively with a diverse team of scientists, analysts, field staff, and data engineers across the organizationAbility to function effectively both independently and as part of a geographically distributed teamFamiliarity with relational databases and the ability to construct complex queries using SQLA keen attention to detail and a profound appreciation for and commitment to using data to tell a compelling story via data visualizationsQualifications (preferred)Master's degree preferred with a specialization in Statistics, Data Science, Health Services Research, Social Science disciplines or a related fieldPrior experience with and knowledge of statistics, demography, mathematics, data science, epidemiology, or other quantitative fieldExperience working with large publicly available datasets on public health, economics, health outcomes, and community-level indicators of wellness and equityExperience and interest working with diverse analytic methodologies (e.g., longitudinal data analysis, multilevel modeling, difference-in-difference, econometrics, grounded theory)Ability to produce markdown notebooks with Jupyter, RStudio, or similar platformQualitative evaluation experience with an emphasis on NVivo or a related qualitative software (i.e. reviewing and coding)Mixed-methods experience and/or experience analyzing qualitative data from surveys, interviews, and focus groupsExperience analyzing large distributed datasets using technologies like Hadoop and/or SparkApplication Submission GuidelinesApplications will be considered on a rolling basis. To apply, please submit the following materials:CV/resumeCover LetterTwo writing samples (peer-reviewed journal article, technical reports, white paper, data visualization product, etc.)Job Type: Full-time",466,Washington
64,Unstructured Data Senior Presales Engineer - Virginia,Dell Technologies,"Arlington, VA 22201 (Lyon Park area)",None,"The success of our customers is the foundation of our success. As part of a customer-centric sales team, presales systems engineers discover and develop technology solutions that drive measurable outcomes against business goals. As an Unstructured Data Solutions SE, you will be responsible for understanding customer’s data goals, strategies, and environments, designing solutions that fit, and demonstrating their value through whiteboards, presentations, discussions, and documentation.
What you’ll achieve
As a Senior Systems Engineer, you will engage with customers and other members of our field sales teams to translate the full range of Dell Technologies products, services, and solutions into measurable outcomes for your customers.
You will:Build and communicate an account technology plan which includes future state architectures, tactical initiatives and achievements and business relevant technology solutionsResearch and communicate technology, industry and market trends and mentor customers on their technology journeyMaintain knowledge of ecosystem solutions to successfully address customer needs, including an understanding of unstructured data workflows including cloud native application development, artificial intelligence, and vertical specific workloads
Virginia and Northern VA based location - Remote
Take the first step towards your dream career
Every Dell Technologies team member brings something unique to the table. Here’s what we are looking for with this role:
Essential Requirements:
5 years minimum experience supporting the sale of enterprise storage, networking, or systems solutions to large enterprise accounts and data centers
Systems Engineering support for Sales Representatives
Ability to demonstrate solutions to customers/potential customers as part of a sales campaign
Ability to support and manage a customer proof-of-concept promoting key feature functionally and/or performance which differentiates EMC from other industry solutions
Ability to translate technical features into tangible customer business benefits
Preparation and delivery of technical product and architecture presentation at a CxO level
Develop technical solutions to customer business issues including and identifying new technologies or technologies outside of EMC products and solutions
Contribute to meeting revenue targets by providing pertinent, timely and on-going customer technical information flow
Contribute significant portions and/or lead responses to RFPs, RFQs and RFIs
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Travel within the geography and available means of transportation is required with travel outside of the geography occurring occasionally – A valid driver’s license is also required
Desirable Requirements
Isilon and ECS solutions and/or knowledge a huge plus
Network Experience
NAS and Object based solutions competitive to EMC
Working knowledge of AI/ML/DL or high performance computing
Working Knowledge of Healthcare and Higher Education
Dell provides the technology that transforms the way we all work and live. But we are more than a technology company — we are a people company. We inspire, challenge and respect every one of our over 100,000 employees. We also provide them with unparalleled growth and development opportunities. We can’t wait for you to discover this for yourself as an Unstructured Data Senior Systems Engineer on our UDS Commercial team remote Virginia.

Our field sales professionals rely on proactive technical support during the sales process – and our expert Systems Engineering team always steps up to the mark. We lead the development and implementation of complex and specialized products, applications, services and solutions. From delivering sales presentations and product demonstrations, to developing detailed installations or system integration plans, we ensure customers get the innovative, relevant, interoperable solutions they need.
Benefits
We offer highly competitive salaries, bonus programs, world-class benefits, and unparalleled growth and development opportunities — all to create a compelling and rewarding work environment.

If you have the technical skills to take our sales to the next level, this is your opportunity to develop with Dell.

Dell is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Dell are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Dell will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Dell here.
Job ID: R102185",466,Washington
65,Senior Statistician,"Data and Analytic Solutions, Inc. (DAS)","Washington, DC",None,"Please submit your resume, a cover letter listing three projects you have accomplished and you salary requirements to careers@dasconsultants.com
Company Benefits and Advantages
Competitive Salary
Paid Holidays and Vacation
Medical and Dental Insurance
Professional Development
Retirement
HI/Permanent Resident Sponsorship
Supportive Environment
If you have the following skills and qualifications, we would like to speak with you.
SAS Programmers/Developers (Intermediate and Advanced; Base and BI)
Medical Data Analysts with Oracle and Mainframe Experience
Project Managers, Enterprise Architects, Business Analysts
Instructional Designers and Applications Developers
Database Administrators, Web Developers/Designers
Senior Statistician
A senior statistician must have at least 20 years experience performing statistical analysis and at least five years experience analyzing FSIS laboratory sampling, slaughter, and inspection task data. You should be comfortable receiving research requests, developing analysis plans, performing high-level statistical analysis, statistical sampling, and computing required samples sizes. An advanced degree in mathematics or statistics is required. This person must have good written and verbal communication skills. The work location is in Washington DC and is accessible by metro. This is a full-time employment with excellent benefits and competitive compensations.",466,Washington
66,Senior Data Analyst,EdgeConneX,"Herndon, VA",None,"Led by an experienced management team and supported by a strong investor group, including large and experienced institutions and strategic partners, EdgeConneX offers a dynamic, fast-paced work environment where we are bringing flexibility, proximity, power, and connectivity to some of the world’s key businesses. With major offices in Herndon, Denver, and Amsterdam, we have a global footprint and a unified team of employees committed to providing a premier customer experience and delivering the full spectrum of data center solutions, from core to edge, like no other data center provider can do.
Focused on driving innovation and helping our customers define and deliver their own unique vision for the Edge, at any scale, in any market worldwide, for any requirement, we are building tomorrow’s data center infrastructure, today for some of the world’s most demanding Network, Content, and Cloud customers.
Title: Senior Data Analyst
EdgeConneX is processing terabytes of data from back-office applications, data center SCADA information systems, and other enterprise applications in order to build systems that are used to run our company most efficiently. The Sr. Data Analyst is responsible for providing innovative solutions to drive insights from business and operational data. Using MS SQL Server and home-grown frameworks, this individual is responsible for implementing and maintaining this core infrastructure across the globe. This position will report to the Director of Analytics.
Primary Responsibilities
Business Intelligence
Apply predictive modeling, regression, and other techniques to extract insights from businesses and operational data
Deliver analysis tools, reports and services to business user leveraging our Business Intelligence Platform
Reporting and Data Infrastructure
Create and maintain reports and dashboards via Power BI and MS SQL Server Analysis Services
Update and enhance existing reports in EdgeConneX’s reporting tools
Create and maintain complex SQL scripts, SPs and UDFs
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities
Demonstrated experience using SQL to create/modify reports
Ability to build strong relationships across the organization, translate business needs into analysis deliverables, and function well in a fast-paced, dynamic environment with competing priorities
Skilled in investigating and troubleshooting complex data-centric processes and puzzles
Outstanding oral and written communication skills in leading teams and coordinating with peers
Commitment to organizational excellence and constant awareness to seek opportunities for efficiency improvement
Experience/Education
Minimum of 3 years working with SQL
Minimum of 2 years working with MS SQL Server
Experience with Power BI, Tableau or similar visualization tool
Experience or coursework with Predictive Modeling, Machine Learning, or similar techniques
EdgeConneX believes diversity – of thought, backgrounds and experiences – affects all that we do, from our employees to the solutions we deliver. Our goal is to create an environment in which inclusion through diversity helps deepen the lives and work experience of our employees, enhances our innovation and creativity, and enriches our involvement in our communities. EdgeConneX is an equal employment opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, as well as any other category protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws.
yvEVXYf8Wu",466,Washington
67,"Data Analyst, Senior Consultant - Energy, Sustainability and Infrastructure",Guidehouse,"Washington, DC 20036 (Dupont Circle area)",None,"Overview:

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.
Responsibilities:

We seek a candidate to join our analytics team supporting Guidehouse’s Energy, Sustainability, and Infrastructure group. As a member of our team you will work with utilities and energy providers, investors and large corporations, NGOs, and the public sector to create sustainable, resilient communities and infrastructure. You will perform a wide range of analytics-related activities including forecast distributed energy resource market adoption at granular locational and temporal levels; develop models to identify market opportunities and evaluate energy efficiency, load management, renewables, EVs, and energy storage programs; advise clients regarding mobility-related strategy and operations, particularly for transportation electrification and new customer programs; develop models to inform decarbonization strategy and conduct resiliency-related analytics; inform grid modernization and enhance the operational performance of grid assets; develop load forecasting models used for resource and revenue planning and performing analytics to inform rate design; use analytics to inform client business strategy and identify process improvements.
Qualifications:
Master’s (or Bachelor’s with work experience) in Data Science, Economics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Environmental Engineering/Science, Computational Physics, or other analytics degree
Strong understanding of one or several programming languages, such as R (and R’s “Tidyverse” packages), Python, SQL, as well as analytics software/platforms such as Analytica and GIS
Outstanding problem-solving skills and critical thinking
Demonstrated proficiency with spreadsheets, databases, word processing, and slide presentation software
Excellent verbal and written communication skills; ability to simply convey complex concepts
Highly developed organizational and time-management skills
High degree of self-confidence and determination; ability to self-teach
Ability to work independently and as part of a team
Ability to provide guidance, coaching, training
Strong interest in electric mobility and decarbonization
Desired:

Academic background and/or practical experience in big data analysis, statistics, machine learning, System Dynamics, linear and nonlinear optimization, Monte Carlo analysis, risk analysis and decision theory, or consumer choice analysis
Experience in the energy industry, particularly electric mobility
Experience with web-based data viewers (PowerBI, Shiny R, and/or Spotfire)
Experience with version control, integration testing, unit testing, and regression testing
Additional Requirements:

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.
This position is open to candidates virtually from Montana, New Mexico, Utah, Wyoming, Arizona, Hawaii or Eastern, Pacific, and Central time zones.
Disclaimer:

About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.
Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.
If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.
Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.
Rewards and Benefits
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive",466,Washington
68,DIA Senior Data Scientist,ITA International,"Washington, DC",None,"Overview:

ITA International is a global service provider leveraging subject matter expertise, data analytics and technology ensuring mission success for customers, “In The Arena.”
ITA is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our team in Washington, DC.

Responsibilities:

Senior Data Scientists require 10+ years of relevant experience. They utilize statistical techniques to analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of data in order to create, validate, and implement data models to solve problems and answer questions. They create data packages in the form of databases, reports, and visualizations.
Duties include:
Automate and optimize data extraction, cleaning, processing, and analysis functions.Applying descriptive and inferential statistics to describe data and make predictions about the data, including statistical tests to determine confidence in hypotheses, fitting distributions, and predicting event likelihoods.Execute data science methods using common programming and scripting languages: Python, Java, Scala, RExtract information from open source information stored in a wide range of possible formats, including JSON, XML, raw text logs, industry-specific encodings, and graph link data.Execute data science methods using parallel computing frameworks (e.g., deeplearning4j, Torch, Tensor Flow, Caffe, Neon, NVIDIA CUDA Deep Neural Network library (cuDNN), and OpenCV)Execute data science methods using distributed data processing networks (e.g., Hadoop (including HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Impala, Giraph, Sqoop), Spark (including MLib, GraphX, SQL and Dataframes)

Qualifications:

10+ years of relevant data science experience.
Active TS/SCI clearance.
ITA international is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive
consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin,
disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Equal Opportunity Employer – Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
In compliance with the ADA Amendments Act (ADAAA), ITA International would like to ensure that your application process goes as smoothly as possible. If you have a disability and would like to request an accommodation in order to apply for a currently open position with ITA, please contact us by phone at 757-246-6781 or email us at ITA-HR@ita-intl.com",466,Washington
69,Sr. Data Scientist,By Light Professional IT Services LLC,"Washington, DC 20002 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"Overview:

By Light is seeking a Sr. Data Scientist to join our team. This position supports the Defensive Intelligence Agency in the DC Metro Area.
Responsibilities:
Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data, including latent semantic indexing (LSI), entity identification and tagging, complex event processing (CEP), and the application of analysis algorithms on distributed, clustered, and cloud-based high-performance infrastructures.
Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases visualized through multi-dimensional interfaces.
Handle processing and index requests against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams.
Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data.
Required Experience/Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree plus 10-12 years of related experience; Master's degree plus 6-8 years of related experience; PhD plus 3-5 years of related experience
Preferred Experience/Qualifications:
Experience with statistical programming languages and packages including R, SAS, SPSS, etc. preferred
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes are preferred
DoD IAT Level II certification preferred
Special Requirements/Security Clearance:
Top Secret Clearance required",466,Washington
70,Senior Principal Data Scientist,Praescient Analytics,"Herndon, VA",None,"Praescient Analytics, LLC is a Veteran-led, certified Woman-Owned Small Business (WOSB) founded in 2011 which specializes in implementing advanced analytics solutions across the defense, intelligence, and law enforcement communities. With over 40 contracts across 6 continents, over 70% of our employees are veterans and or have intel/law enforcement experience. We fully understand the unique challenges of our clients and work to identify, vet, implement, and enhance commercial and proprietary technologies to provide full scope solutions, because we have been there. Praescient has extensive experience designing, developing, and integrating solutions for customers including the US Army, Special Operations Command (SOCOM), US Navy (USN), US Marine Corps (USMC), US Coast Guard (USCG), Department of Justice (DOJ), Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA), and Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI), Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), intelligence community, and local law enforcement agencies, among others.

Transforming All-Source Analysis with Location-Based Object Services (TALOS) provides Information Technology (IT)-based efforts required to support Department of Defense (DoD) and the Intelligence Community (IC) for technology and concept development. DoD's intelligence mission is to provide accurate, relevant, and timely data and intelligence to tactical, operational, and strategic decision makers across the Combatant Commands, nuclear, conventional, and Special Operations Forces. Decision superiority is the competitive advantage, enabled by an ongoing situational awareness that allows commanders and their forces to make informed decisions and implement them as fast and effectively as the situation warrants. The purpose of this effort is to advance the state of the art in Big Data, data analysis, Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine Learning (ML), and advanced analytics to enhance the DoD's and the IC's information processes and technical architectures.

Primary Responsibilities:

Performs AI-related software engineering and development activities using an Agile DevSecOps model
Designs and implements AI and machine learning approaches and algorithms that can be used to enhance analyst effectiveness using tools and techniques such as Java, Python, R, PySPark, and TensorFlow or similar frameworks
Creates hypotheses for and identifies relationships within data that can be leveraged using advanced analytic methods including AI and machine learning
Collaborates with other members of the scrum team to create and implement new data labeling and analytic algorithms and visualizations that codify new techniques
Develops approaches to cross-correlate data sources and ensure consistency among data-sets and builds mathematical models using the data
Works with human factors engineers and Web software developers to create visualization techniques that aid analysts in understanding data
Monitors algorithms to measure efficiency and effectiveness and provides recommendations for improvements as needed

Required Qualifications:

TS/SCI with CI Polygraph active security clearance
Bachelor's degree with 9 years of relevant experience OR a Master's degree with 7years of relevant experience OR a PhD with 4 years of relevant experience; an additional 4 years of experience maybe considered in lieu of a degree requirement
Nine (9+) years experience performing AI-related software engineering and development activities supporting, maintaining, and enhancing applications using Agile methodologies
Tools/Skills: AWS, Java, Python, JSON, Spring, Spring Boot, Docker, JIRA, Git, Junit, RDBMS technology, Elasticsearch and/or SOLR, NoSQL technology (Hadoop and/or EMR, Web UI Javascript frameworks (e.g. JQuery, Angular, React)

What you can expect from us:

Real opportunity for career growth in an environment where your achievements will be celebrated
Constant collaboration with numerous teams to ensure client success
A team that respects and embraces your ideas and expertise
Coworkers that are motivated by pursuing excellence, rather than the prospect of personal gain
A workplace dedicated to supporting and bettering public safety and government agencies

Benefits:

Very competitive salary based on qualifications and experience
Comprehensive, Company paid United Health Care Medical for you and your family (We pay your premiums and deductibles)
401(k) & 4% matching
Travel & performance incentives
3 weeks paid time off (plus Federal Holidays)
$5K annual training allowance
$500 book allowance
Tuition reimbursement program

Praescient Analytics is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for all. Employees and applicants without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity, national origin, legally protected physical or mental disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or status in the uniformed services of the United States, status as a disabled veteran or veteran of the Vietnam era, or on any other basis which is protected under applicable law. This includes a commitment to provide a work environment that is free from all forms of illegal harassment including sexual harassment.

This covers all terms and conditions of employment including (but not limited to):


Hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, or demotion of all job classifications;
Recruiting, advertising or solicitation for employment;
Treatment during employment;
Rates of pay or other forms of compensation;
Benefits;
Selection for training;
Company sponsored social and recreational activities; and
Layoff or termination

Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
US Citizenship Required
Praescient Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Interested Candidates: Please forward your resume to recruiting@praescientanalytics.com and please visit our website to apply online at www.praescientanalytics.applicantstack.com/x/openings",466,Washington
71,Senior Business Intelligence / Data Analyst,NTT DATA Services,"Arlington, VA",None,"Req ID: 135007
NTT DATA Services strives to hire exceptional, innovative and passionate individuals who want to grow with us. If you want to be part of an inclusive, adaptable, and forward-thinking organization, apply now.
We are currently seeking a Senior Business Intelligence / Data Analyst to join our team in Arlington, Virginia (US-VA), United States (US).
Senior Business Intelligence / Data Analyst will assist with business process improvements by utilizing their business intelligence and data analytical skills across the client’s organization by:
Providing Business Intelligence (BI) in support to the Business Program Management Office initiatives; deliverables include BI reports to the client
Enhancing and providing recommendations on the design, structure and use of a SharePoint portal for the client
Delivering written recommendations to the Government on BI reports and views to support the client’s organizations progress and/or delays on work initiatives, for definition of a SharePoint Portal.
Enhancing the quality of products and services through feedback, mentoring, and continual process improvement
Providing support in defining, developing, and institutionalizing standards to ensure consistent and measurable performance across the organization
Conducting process improvement initiatives and performing routine internal audits to ensure compliance to established standards
Utilizing customer, industry and business trends; and apply this understanding to meet project objectives
Validating procedures and processes with a view toward enhancement or improvement; analyze information and situations; and implement actions through the management team to ensure project objectives are met
Providing feedback, mentoring, and training support for staff to improve processes, enhance services, prevent work product defects, and refine standards. Also, supports Special Projects/Tasking
Identifying, defining, developing, and institutionalizing Business Process standards, templates, policies, processes, and guidelines in support of as related to Agile Software development framework, Scrum Project Management framework and Team Foundation Server workflow. Also, maintain legacy process and procedures for projects using the waterfall approach
Providing analytical, planning, and implementation support services for performance measurement, metrics analysis, and process improvement of Projects and Programs as well as support in the preparation and presentation of technical, management, and operational briefings, data calls, and reports
Providing experience and expertise in Information Technology Infrastructure Library (ITIL) implementation and reporting; in developing and implementing IT chargeback models for data centers; and in developing and marketing IT enterprise wide support services
Tools:
MS Office Suite (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
Microsoft Office Visio
Microsoft Office Project
MS SharePoint
MS Power BI
ServiceNow
General Skills
Providing Weekly and Monthly Status Reporting
Providing meeting support (facilitate meetings, prepare agenda, prepare project briefings, present to the stakeholders, document and distribute meeting minutes, and track actions)
Support other PMO tasks as assigned
Flexibility is a must, as well as the ability to work in a collaborative team environment.
Exceptional organizational skills with the ability to coordinate multiple work streams, multi-task and work well under tight deadlines
Strong interpersonal skills and proven experience in building partnerships with business and technical stakeholders as applicable
Self-starter with ability to perform and lead work independently.
Participate in project planning and schedule development/maintenance activities
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree (BS/BA in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Business, Physical Science, or other technology-related discipline)
Minimum 10 years experience supporting IT Projects.
Minimum 6 years in:
Using Information Technology based applications to implement process improvement and reengineering methodologies to client business processes. Duties may include:
Data analysis and data modeling activities
Developing improvements to business methods on IT related projects
Transition planning introduction, and integration of new IT processes
Group facilitation and training for newly implemented IT processes
Act as key coordinator between multiple process stakeholders and project.
Must have a minimum of Secret Clearance
About NTT DATA Services
NTT DATA Services is a global business and IT services provider specializing in digital, cloud and automation across a comprehensive portfolio of consulting, applications, infrastructure and business process services. We are part of the NTT family of companies, a partner to 85 % of the Fortune 100.
NTT DATA Services is an equal opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, gender, disability, age, veteran-status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other class protected by law.",466,Washington
72,Senior Outreach Data Scientist,"Salient CRGT, Inc","McLean, VA 22102",None,"Job Description:

Are you looking for a new and exciting career opportunity?
Join our award-winning organization and work with some of the most talented minds within our Enterprise Technology and Innovation teams. As a Salient CRGT employee, you get to be part of a best performing team supporting our nation’s most critical missions.
Why Salient CRGT?
We’re passionate about the inspirational missions of our customers and we entrust our employees and teams to deliver exceptional performance to enable the safety, security, health and well-being of our nation. We provide the tools and resources to help you be successful, and our culture fosters an environment in which idea sharing and collaboration is essential. Are you ready to make a difference?
We are seeking a senior level Outreach Data Scientist.
This role fullfills the following responsibilites:
implements a continuous review process to evaluate the effectiveness of processes and standards for identifying process improvements to drive improved efficiency and quality
evaluates quality issues, inefficient processes, product quality, customer feedback, and analyst recommendations to identify process and product improvements
identifies opportunities to eliminate duplication of effort, improve analyst effectiveness and efficiency, eliminate backlog, reduce accuracy issues, and improve general operations
conducts briefings on improvement recommendations, gaining approval for implementation, and coordinating implementation improvements
implementation of tools, scripts, algorithms, and techniques assesses the effectiveness of the improvements
assesses and reports on metrics
#cjpost
Required Qualifications:

The following are minimum requirements for the role:
10+ years of experience
MA/MS degree
Experience continuous process improvement (CPI) researcher and facilitator
Experience working in NCTC screening and vetting using NCTC IC databases
Analytical and critical thinking skills
Knowledge of SOPs and Government watchlisting and screening and vetting guidelines
Advanced communication skills including documentation and briefings
Knowledge of ODNI, NCTC, and IC mission, roles, and responsibilities
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance
#super6
#muncyreqs
#ahreqs
Desired Qualifications:
Recognized expert in specific field
Salient CRGT is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws.",466,Washington
73,Senior Data Analyst,Compass,"Washington, DC",None,"At Compass, we envision a world where the experience of selling or buying a home is simple and pleasant for everyone. Founded in 2012, Compass provides an end-to-end platform that empowers residential real estate agents to deliver exceptional service to their seller and buyer clients, all in service of our mission to help everyone find their place in the world.
The Data Product team's mission is to envision, build, and deploy the next generation end-to-end platform for real estate data ingestion, processing, storage, serving, and analysis at massive scale to provide leverage for Compass. Every team and agent at Compass relies on our platform to make data-informed decisions as they grow their business on top of this strong foundation.

About This Role

In this role, you will help Compass become the leading source of real estate information by expanding our geographic coverage, introducing new data types and sources, and ensuring the highest data quality standards are met. You will work cross-functionally with company leadership, product managers, engineers, support teams, and other analysts to grow and maintain the Compass data platform.

Responsibilities

Support our expansion team in efficiently onboarding new data sources with a high bar for quality
Create, test, monitor, and improve key data quality metrics tied to the data quality, platform availability, data freshness, customer experience, etc
Serve as a subject matter expert and escalation point on data quality issues reported by front-line customer and product support teams
Directly interface with third party data sources during onboarding and change or incident management activities
Create and maintain operational and analytical scripts, or other tools to swiftly resolve data quality issues or drive actionable decision-making
Leverage data to build conviction and consensus around prioritizing features that improve the customer experience and scale the business
Confirm feature release readiness by performing ad hoc analyses and tests in support of new product development
Advocate for process improvements to drive our data platform forward with a metrics-driven, continuous improvement approach
Quickly synthesize ambiguous customer problems into clear situation analyses, summarizing the impact radius, solution options, and trade-offs of each

What We Look For

4+ years experience in software product, project management, or engineering roles, building and launching successful data-driven products at scale
Experience manipulating large datasets using various tools or techniques, including Python/Google Apps scripting, SQL, pivot tables, lookups
Looking for people with expertise in data forensics, and who are detail-oriented, outstanding communicators, and are quick to learn new technologies/concepts
Preference given to candidates with 2+ years experience designing, implementing, and maintaining databases and/or data conversion/ETL pipelines
B.A., B.S., or similar degree in a technical discipline (Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics) is strongly preferred
Knowledge of, or prior experience with, real estate data integrations is a plus
Do your best work, be your authentic self

At Compass, we believe that everyone deserves to find their place in the world — a place where they feel like they belong, where they can be their authentic selves, where they can thrive. Our collaborative, energetic culture is grounded in our Compass Entrepreneurship Principles and our commitment to diversity, equity, inclusion, growth and mobility. As an equal opportunity employer, we offer competitive compensation packages, robust benefits and professional growth opportunities aimed at helping to improve our employees' lives and careers.

Notice for California Applicants",466,Washington
74,Senior Data Analyst,Custom Ink,"Fairfax, VA 22031",None,"Are you a curious-by-nature analyst with a knack for connecting the dots between complex data sets, technologies, processes, and people? Do you believe in the power of data to improve customer experience and drive business results? If so, we’d love to chat!
Custom Ink, the leader in custom apparel for groups and communities, is all about bringing people together. That's what inspires our innovative online platform, world-class customer support, and award-winning work environment. With 1,600+ team members (“Inkers”), we are passionate about the success and well-being of our team and have earned frequent recognition as a top workplace from such organizations as Fortune Magazine and The Washington Post. Our customers are counting on us to come through for them, and that’s important to all Inkers - no matter what role they’re in.
How you’ll make a difference:
As Senior Data Analyst, focused on our Operations initiatives, you’ll be a strategic partner in ensuring the effectiveness and efficiency of our Supply Chain, Production, and Order Ops initiatives. Through deep and thoughtful data analysis, business acumen, and collaboration with stakeholders across the business, you’ll serve as a strong partner for driving important business decisions. At Custom Ink, we love data so your skills will be in high demand and your work will be highly visible. You’ll also play a critical role in elevating the Data & Analytics team and will report to the Director of Data Analytics.
What you’ll do:
Custom Ink is focused on growth, high-performance, and innovation, all while delivering a best in class customer experience no matter the touchpoint. As Senior Data Analyst working with our Operations teams, you’ll:
Collaborate with leaders across Operations functions to navigate early stage, and sometimes nebulous (but exciting!) business questions
Deliver insightful analyses that inform strategic level decisions around operations initiatives and efficiency efforts while being mindful of the potential impact to our customers, our business, and our people
Expose root cause of changes and trends and recommend actions to accelerate or curb them
Provide the business with tools that empower stakeholders to easily and effectively perform their own analyses
Collaborate with Data & Analytics leaders to plan for and prioritize work that keeps us oriented toward goals that drive our business forward as well as continuously evaluate process and collaboration within the D&A function to increase capacity
Proactively find, investigate, and make recommendations on achieving and advancing our business goals
Contribute to the performance of your peers through collaboration and partnership while leveraging business acumen
Maintain a big picture focus while directly supporting specific channels - no area of our business is an island!
How you’ll be measured:
Success in this role is critical to the successful and healthy growth of Custom Ink and vital to the operational logistics and efficiency of how our teams work to provide the best experience to our customers. Therefore, success will be measured by:
Perform insightful and actionable analyses that helps drive improvements in Supply Chain, Order Operations and Production
Expose root cause of changes and trends and recommend actions to accelerate or curb them
Become a trusted advisor to our Operations teams
Be a champion of data democratization throughout the company
Impact of analysis on business results
Performance of existing, evolved, and new initiatives
Operational cost savings and process optimization driving efficiency gains
What we’re looking for:
This is a critical role so we’ve set our sights high:
5+ years experience performing analysis on large and often incomplete data sets and translating results for consumption by business partners. Supply Chain/Operations experience a plus.
Expert in SQL and Excel
Experience with stats/modeling software (ex. R, SAS, Python), BI software (ex. Tableau, Power BI)
Excellence in statistics, data & analytics, predictive modeling & hypothesis testing
Knowledge of machine learning techniques (logistic regression, linear regression, etc.) for business problems
Demonstrated strategic problem solver
Ability to be a strong partner to the business, influence decision making and focus on details while keeping an eye on overall objective
Exceptional quantitative and qualitative skills with the ability to understand details and see the big picture
Ability to juggle multiple ongoing projects and work autonomously
Ability to determine tech and data needs from business requirements
Values data integrity and accurate reporting
Track record of tackling large and complex operational challenges with positivity, creativity, and pragmatism
Stellar interpersonal and communication skills, including the ability to adjust approach/message by audience
A passion for continuous improvement and problem solving, with a genuine desire to own and build something special
A head for business and numbers and a heart for people
In addition, you must share our company values—practicing the Golden Rule, taking Ownership, and driving and embracing Innovation.
Custom Ink uses E-Verify to confirm the employment eligibility of all new team members. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, please visit www.dhs.gov/E-Verify.
CustomInk, LLC (""Custom Ink"") is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We celebrate diversity in all forms and are committed to maintaining a discrimination-free workplace that treats applicants and employees with dignity and respect. Our employment process is conducted without regard to race, color, religion, nationality or ethnic background, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or other attributes protected by state, federal, and local law.",466,Washington
